Sold For
Tax
You Receive
Sell For
Privacy policy
1.Introduction
1.1We are committed to safeguarding the privacy of our website visitors and service users.
1.2This policy applies where we are acting as a data controller with respect to the personal data of our website visitors and service users; in other words, where we determine the purposes and means of the processing of that personal data.
1.3We use cookies on our website. Insofar as those cookies are not strictly necessary for the provision of our website and services, we will ask you to consent to our use of cookies when you first visit our website.
1.4In this policy, "we", "us" and "our" refer to FUTWIZ Ltd. For more information about us, see Section 13.
2.Credit
2.1This document was created using a template from Docular (https://docular.net).
3.How we use your personal data
3.1In this Section 3 we have set out:
(a)the general categories of personal data that we may process;
(b)in the case of personal data that we did not obtain directly from you, the source and specific categories of that data;
(c)the purposes for which we may process personal data; and
(d)the legal bases of the processing.
3.2We may process data about your use of our website and services ("
usage data
"). The usage data may include your IP address, geographical location, browser type and version, operating system, referral source, length of visit, page views and website navigation paths, as well as information about the timing, frequency and pattern of your service use. The source of the usage data is our analytics tracking system. This usage data may be processed for the purposes of analysing the use of the website and services. The legal basis for this processing is consent or our legitimate interests, namely monitoring and improving our website and services.
3.3We may process your account data ("
account data
"). The account data may include your name and email address. The source of the account data is direct from yourself but only with your explicit permission. The account data may be processed for the purposes of operating our website, providing our services, ensuring the security of our website and services, maintaining back-ups of our databases and communicating with you. The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of our website and business.
3.4We may process your information included in your personal profile on our website ("
profile data
"). The profile data may include your console gamertags and social media links. The profile data may be processed for the purposes of enabling and monitoring your use of our website and services. The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of our website and business.
3.5We may process your personal data that is provided in the course of the use of our services ("
service data
"). The service data may include the timing, frequency and pattern of service use. The source of the service data is you. The service data may be processed for the purposes of operating our website, providing our services, ensuring the security of our website and services, maintaining back-ups of our databases and communicating with you. The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of our website and business.
3.6We may process information that you post for publication on our website or through our services ("
publication data
"). The publication data may be processed for the purposes of enabling such publication and administering our website and services. The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of our website and business.
3.7We may process information that you provide to us for the purpose of subscribing to our email notifications and/or newsletters ("
notification data
"). The notification data may be processed for the purposes of sending you the relevant notifications and/or newsletters. The legal basis for this processing is the performance of a contract between you and us and/or taking steps, at your request, to enter into such a contract.
3.8We may process information contained in or relating to any communication that you send to us ("
correspondence data
"). The correspondence data may include the communication content and metadata associated with the communication. Our website will generate the metadata associated with communications made using the website contact forms. The correspondence data may be processed for the purposes of communicating with you and record-keeping. The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of our website and business and communications with users.
3.9In addition to the specific purposes for which we may process your personal data set out in this Section 3, we may also process any of your personal data where such processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, or in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person.
3.10Please do not supply any other person's personal data to us, unless we prompt you to do so.
4.Providing your personal data to others
4.1We may disclose your personal data to any member of our group of companies (this means our subsidiaries, our ultimate holding company and all its subsidiaries) insofar as reasonably necessary for the purposes, and on the legal bases, set out in this policy.
4.2We may disclose your personal data to our insurers and/or professional advisers insofar as reasonably necessary for the purposes of obtaining or maintaining insurance coverage, managing risks, obtaining professional advice, or the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims, whether in court proceedings or in an administrative or out-of-court procedure.
4.3We may disclose email addresses to our suppliers or subcontractors insofar as reasonably necessary for sending you our email newsletter, if you have requested it (you can inform us at any time if you no longer require the newsletter).
4.4In addition to the specific disclosures of personal data set out in this Section 4, we may disclose your personal data where such disclosure is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, or in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person. We may also disclose your personal data where such disclosure is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims, whether in court proceedings or in an administrative or out-of-court procedure.
5.International transfers of your personal data
5.1In this Section 5, we provide information about the circumstances in which your personal data may be transferred to countries outside the European Economic Area (EEA).
5.2The hosting facilities for our website are situated in the UK. The European Commission has made an "adequacy decision" with respect to the data protection laws of each of these countries. Transfers to each of these countries will be protected by appropriate safeguards, namely EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework.
5.3Mailing databases are situated in the UK. The European Commission has made an "adequacy decision" with respect to the data protection laws of each of these countries. Transfers to each of these countries will be protected by appropriate safeguards, namely  EU-U.S. Privacy Shield and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield.
5.4You acknowledge that personal data that you submit for publication through our website or services may be available, via the internet, around the world. We cannot prevent the use (or misuse) of such personal data by others.
6.Retaining and deleting personal data
6.1This Section 6 sets out our data retention policies and procedure, which are designed to help ensure that we comply with our legal obligations in relation to the retention and deletion of personal data.
6.2Personal data that we process for any purpose or purposes shall not be kept for longer than is necessary for that purpose or those purposes.
6.3We will retain and delete your personal data as follows:
(a)Profile data containing personal data will be retained for no longer than 30 days..
(b)Cookie data will be retained for no longer than 30 days.
6.4Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Section 6, we may retain your personal data where such retention is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, or in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person.
7.Amendments
7.1We may update this policy from time to time by publishing a new version on our website.
7.2You should check this page occasionally to ensure you are happy with any changes to this policy.
7.3We may notify you of changes to this policy by email or through the private messaging system on our website.
8.Your rights
8.1In this Section 8, we have summarised the rights that you have under data protection law. Some of the rights are complex, and not all of the details have been included in our summaries. Accordingly, you should read the relevant laws and guidance from the regulatory authorities for a full explanation of these rights.
8.2Your principal rights under data protection law are:
(a)the right to access;
(b)the right to rectification;
(c)the right to erasure;
(d)the right to restrict processing;
(e)the right to object to processing;
(f)the right to data portability;
(g)the right to complain to a supervisory authority; and
(h)the right to withdraw consent.
8.3You have the right to confirmation as to whether or not we process your personal data and, where we do, access to the personal data, together with certain additional information. That additional information includes details of the purposes of the processing, the categories of personal data concerned and the recipients of the personal data. Providing the rights and freedoms of others are not affected, we will supply to you a copy of your personal data. The first copy will be provided free of charge, but additional copies may be subject to a reasonable fee. Provision of such information will be subject to:
(a)the first copy will be provided free of charge, but additional copies will be subjected to a GBP 10 administration fee; and
(b)the supply of appropriate evidence of your identity (for this purpose, we will usually accept a photocopy of your passport certified by a solicitor or bank plus an original copy of a utility bill showing your current address).
8.4You have the right to have any inaccurate personal data about you rectified and, taking into account the purposes of the processing, to have any incomplete personal data about you completed.
8.5In some circumstances you have the right to the erasure of your personal data without undue delay. Those circumstances include: the personal data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed; you withdraw consent to consent-based processing; you object to the processing under certain rules of applicable data protection law; the processing is for direct marketing purposes; and the personal data have been unlawfully processed. However, there are exclusions of the right to erasure. The general exclusions include where processing is necessary: for exercising the right of freedom of expression and information; for compliance with a legal obligation; or for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
8.6In some circumstances you have the right to restrict the processing of your personal data. Those circumstances are: you contest the accuracy of the personal data; processing is unlawful but you oppose erasure; we no longer need the personal data for the purposes of our processing, but you require personal data for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims; and you have objected to processing, pending the verification of that objection. Where processing has been restricted on this basis, we may continue to store your personal data. However, we will only otherwise process it: with your consent; for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims; for the protection of the rights of another natural or legal person; or for reasons of important public interest.
8.7You have the right to object to our processing of your personal data on grounds relating to your particular situation, but only to the extent that the legal basis for the processing is that the processing is necessary for: the performance of a task carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of any official authority vested in us; or the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party. If you make such an objection, we will cease to process the personal information unless we can demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your interests, rights and freedoms, or the processing is for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
8.8You have the right to object to our processing of your personal data for direct marketing purposes (including profiling for direct marketing purposes). If you make such an objection, we will cease to process your personal data for this purpose.
8.9If you consider that our processing of your personal information infringes data protection laws, you have a legal right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority responsible for data protection. You may do so in the EU member state of your habitual residence, your place of work or the place of the alleged infringement.
8.10To the extent that the legal basis for our processing of your personal information is consent, you have the right to withdraw that consent at any time. Withdrawal will not affect the lawfulness of processing before the withdrawal.
8.11You may exercise any of your rights in relation to your personal data by contacting us using the details outlined in section 13.
9.About cookies
9.1A cookie is a file containing an identifier (a string of letters and numbers) that is sent by a web server to a web browser and is stored by the browser. The identifier is then sent back to the server each time the browser requests a page from the server.
9.2Cookies may be either "persistent" cookies or "session" cookies: a persistent cookie will be stored by a web browser and will remain valid until its set expiry date, unless deleted by the user before the expiry date; a session cookie, on the other hand, will expire at the end of the user session, when the web browser is closed.
9.3Cookies do not typically contain any information that personally identifies a user, but personal information that we store about you may be linked to the information stored in and obtained from cookies.
10.Cookies that we use
10.1We use cookies for the following purposes:
(a)authentication - we use cookies to identify you when you visit our website and as you navigate our website;
(b)status - we use cookies to help us to determine if you are logged into our website;
(c)security - we use cookies as an element of the security measures used to protect user accounts, including preventing fraudulent use of login credentials, and to protect our website and services generally;
(d)advertising - we use cookies to help us to display advertisements that will be relevant to you (cookies used for this purpose are: Google AdSense, Google AdExchange, Avocet, PulsePoint, Teads, Skimlinks, Monetizer 101);
(e)analysis - we use cookies to help us to analyse the use and performance of our website and services (cookies used for this purpose are: Google Analytics, ComScore, Google Tag Manager, Crazy Egg, Facebook Audience, Google Analytics Audience);
(f)cookie consent - we use cookies to store your preferences in relation to the use of cookies more generally.
11.Cookies used by our service providers
11.1We use Network N to provide advertisements on our website. This service uses cookies to provide advertisements about goods and services of interest to you. You can view the privacy policy of this service provider at
https://www.network-n.com/privacy-policy/
.
11.2We use Google Analytics and Comscore to analyse the use of our website. Google Analytics and Comscore gather information about website use by means of cookies. The information gathered relating to our website is used to create reports about the use of our website. Google's privacy policy is available at:
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/
. Comscore’s privacy policy is available at
https://www.comscore.com/About-comScore/Privacy-Policy
.
11.3We publish Google AdSense interest-based advertisements on our website. These are tailored by Google to reflect your interests. To determine your interests, Google will track your behaviour on our website and on other websites across the web using cookies. You can view, delete or add interest categories associated with your browser by visiting: https://adssettings.google.com. You can also opt out of the AdSense partner network cookie using those settings or using the Network Advertising Initiative's multi-cookie opt-out mechanism at: http://optout.networkadvertising.org. However, these opt-out mechanisms themselves use cookies, and if you clear the cookies from your browser your opt-out will not be maintained. To ensure that an opt-out is maintained in respect of a particular browser, you may wish to consider using the Google browser plug-ins available at: https://support.google.com/ads/answer/7395996.
11.4We use Avocet, OpenX, PulsePoint, Sovrn and Google Audiences to carry out retargeting and Header Bidding. These service uses cookies for retargeting ads and targeting ads based on your interests. You can view the privacy policy of these service providers at
http://avocet.io/privacy-policy
,
https://www.openx.com/legal/privacy-policy/
,
https://www.pulsepoint.com/privacy-policy.html
,
https://www.sovrn.com/privacy-policy/
and
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/
Managing cookies
12.1Most browsers allow you to refuse to accept cookies and to delete cookies. The methods for doing so vary from browser to browser, and from version to version. You can however obtain up-to-date information about blocking and deleting cookies via these links:
Manage FUTWIZ Cookie Settings
(a)https://support.google.com/chrome/answer/95647?hl=en (Chrome);
(b)https://support.mozilla.org/en-US/kb/enable-and-disable-cookies-website-preferences (Firefox);
(c)http://www.opera.com/help/tutorials/security/cookies/ (Opera);
(d)https://support.microsoft.com/en-gb/help/17442/windows-internet-explorer-delete-manage-cookies (Internet Explorer);
(e)https://support.apple.com/kb/PH21411 (Safari); and
(f)https://privacy.microsoft.com/en-us/windows-10-microsoft-edge-and-privacy (Edge).
12.2Blocking all cookies will have a negative impact upon the usability of many websites.
12.3If you block cookies, you will not be able to use all the features on our website.
13.Our details
13.1This website is owned and operated by FUTWIZ Ltd.
13.2We are registered in the United Kingdom under registration number 08304877, and our registered office is at 20-22 Wenlock Road, London, N1 7GU.
13.3Our principal place of business is at 20-22 Wenlock Road, London, N1 7GU
13.4You can contact us:
(a)You can contact us by email, using privacy@futwiz.com
We use third party advertisements to support our site. Some of these advertisers may be served from our third party advertiser, you can view their
privacy policy
and
cookie policy
. You can manage your cookies here.
We use Google Analytics and Comscore to analyse the use of our website. Google Analytics and Comscore gather information about website use by means of cookies. The information gathered relating to our website is used to create reports about the use of our website. Google's privacy policy is available at: https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/. Comscore’s privacy policy is available at https://www.comscore.com/About-comScore/Privacy-Policy.
Manage Cookie Settings
Facebook
Twitter
YouTube
Instagram
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.network-n.com/privacy-policy/:
Network N - avatar
Profile
Introduction
We are committed to safeguarding the privacy of our website visitors and service users.
This policy applies where we are acting as a data controller with respect to the personal data of our website visitors and service users; in other words, where we determine the purposes and means of the processing of that personal data.
We use cookies on our website. Insofar as those cookies are not strictly necessary for the provision of our website and services, we will ask you to consent to our use of cookies when you first visit our website.
In this policy, “we”, “us” and “our” refer to Network N Limited. For more information about us, see Section 10.
Credit
This document was created using a template from Docular: https://docular.net
How we use your personal data
In this Section 3 we have set out:
(a) the general categories of personal data that we may process;(b) in the case of personal data that we did not obtain directly from you, the source and specific categories of that data;(c) the purposes for which we may process personal data; and(d) the legal bases of the processing.
We may process your account data (“account data“). The account data may include your name and email address. The source of the account data is directly from you, but only with your explicit permission. The account data may be processed for the purposes of operating our website, providing our services, ensuring the security of our website and services, maintaining back-ups of our databases and communicating with you. The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of our website and business.
We may process your personal data that is provided in the course of the use of our services (“service data“). The service data may include the timing, frequency and pattern of service use. The source of the service data is you. The service data may be processed for the purposes of operating our website, providing our services, ensuring the security of our website and services, maintaining back-ups of our databases and communicating with you. The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of our website and business.
We may process information that you post for publication on our website or through our services (“publication data”). The publication data may be processed for the purposes of enabling such publication and administering our website and services. The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of our website and business.
We may process information that you provide to us for the purpose of subscribing to our email notifications and/or newsletters (“notification data”). The notification data may be processed for the purposes of sending you the relevant notifications and/or newsletters. The legal basis for this processing is the performance of a contract between you and us and/or taking steps, at your request, to enter into such a contract.
We may process information contained in or relating to any communication that you send to us (“correspondence data“). The correspondence data may include the communication content and metadata associated with the communication. Our website will generate the metadata associated with communications made using the website contact forms. The correspondence data may be processed for the purposes of communicating with you and record-keeping. The legal basis for this processing is our legitimate interests, namely the proper administration of our website and business and communications with users.
In addition to the specific purposes for which we may process your personal data set out in this Section 3, we may also process any of your personal data where such processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, or in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person.
We may process data about your use of our website and services (“usage data“). The usage data may include your IP address, ISP (Internet Services Provider), geographical location, browser type and version, operating system, referral source, length of visit, page views, the content of pages visited, and website navigation paths, as well as information about the timing, frequency and pattern of your service use. The sources of the usage data are our analytics tracking systems. This usage data may be processed for the purposes of analysing the use of the website and services. The legal basis for this processing is consent or our legitimate interests, namely monitoring and improving our website and services which may include targeted advertising facilitated by anonymous user ID tokens that reference previous and current interactions our our websites.
Please do not supply any other person’s personal data to us, unless we prompt you to do so.
Providing your personal data to others
We may disclose your personal data to any member of our group of companies (this means our subsidiaries, our ultimate holding company and all its subsidiaries) insofar as reasonably necessary for the purposes, and on the legal bases, set out in this policy.
We may disclose your personal data to our insurers and/or professional advisers insofar as reasonably necessary for the purposes of obtaining or maintaining insurance coverage, managing risks, obtaining professional advice, or the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims, whether in court proceedings or in an administrative or out-of-court procedure.
We may disclose your enquiry data to one or more of those selected third party suppliers of goods and services identified on our website for the purpose of enabling them to contact you so that they can offer, market and sell to you relevant goods and/or services. Each such third party will act as a data controller or data processor in relation to the enquiry data that we supply to it; and upon contacting you, each such third party will supply to you a copy of its own privacy policy, which will govern that third party’s use of your personal data.
In addition to the specific disclosures of personal data set out in this Section 4, we may disclose your personal data where such disclosure is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, or in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person. We may also disclose your personal data where such disclosure is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims, whether in court proceedings or in an administrative or out-of-court procedure.
International transfers of your personal data
In this Section 5, we provide information about the circumstances in which your personal data may be transferred to countries outside the European Economic Area (EEA).
The hosting facilities for our website are situated in US, Europe and UK. The European Commission has made an “adequacy decision” with respect to the data protection laws of each of these countries. Transfers to each of these countries will be protected by appropriate safeguards, namely EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework.
Mailing and Competition Entry databases are situated in the US. The European Commission has made an “adequacy decision” with respect to the data protection laws of these countries. Transfers tothese countries will be protected by appropriate safeguards, namely EU-U.S. Privacy Shield and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield.
You acknowledge that personal data that you submit for publication through our website or services may be available, via the internet, around the world. We cannot prevent the use (or misuse) of such personal data by others.
Retaining and deleting personal data
This Section 6 sets out our data retention policies and procedures, which are designed to help ensure that we comply with our legal obligations in relation to the retention and deletion of personal data.
Personal data that we process for any purpose or purposes shall not be kept for longer than is necessary for that purpose or those purposes.
We will retain and delete your personal data as follows:
(a) Profile data containing personal data will be retained for two years following your last login, if you have not logged in for over two years, you will be notified of this. If we have not received notification within 30 days of your intent to use your account we will delete your profile data and notify you of this deletion.
(b) Cookie data will be retained for no longer than 30 days.
Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Section 6, we may retain your personal data where such retention is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, or in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person.
Amendments
We may update this policy from time to time by publishing a new version on our website.
You should check this page occasionally to ensure you are happy with any changes to this policy.
We may notify you of changes to this policy by email or through the private messaging system on our website.
Your rights
In this Section 8, we have summarised the rights that you have under data protection law. Some of the rights are complex, and not all of the details have been included in our summaries. Accordingly, you should read the relevant laws and guidance from the regulatory authorities for a full explanation of these rights.
Your principal rights under General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) are:
(a) the right to access;(b) the right to rectification;(c) the right to erasure;(d) the right to restrict processing;(e) the right to object to processing;
(f) the right to data portability;
(g) the right to complain to a supervisory authority; and
(h) the right to withdraw consent
You have the right to confirmation as to whether or not we process your personal data and, where we do, access to the personal data, together with certain additional information. That additional information includes details of the purposes of the processing, the categories of personal data concerned and the recipients of the personal data. Providing the rights and freedoms of others are not affected, we will supply to you a copy of your personal data. The first copy will be provided free of charge, but additional copies may be subject to a reasonable fee. Provision of such information will be subject to:
(a) the first copy will be provided free of charge, but additional copies will be subjected to a GBP 10 administration fee; and
(b) the supply of appropriate evidence of your identity (for this purpose, we will usually accept a photocopy of your passport certified by a solicitor or bank plus an original copy of a utility bill showing your current address).
You have the right to have any inaccurate personal data about you rectified and, taking into account the purposes of the processing, to have any incomplete personal data about you completed.
In some circumstances you have the right to the erasure of your personal data without undue delay. Those circumstances include: the personal data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed; you withdraw consent to consent-based processing; you object to the processing under certain rules of applicable data protection law; the processing is for direct marketing purposes; and the personal data have been unlawfully processed. However, there are exclusions of the right to erasure. The general exclusions include where processing is necessary: for exercising the right of freedom of expression and information; for compliance with a legal obligation; or for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
In some circumstances you have the right to restrict the processing of your personal data. Those circumstances are: you contest the accuracy of the personal data; processing is unlawful but you oppose erasure; we no longer need the personal data for the purposes of our processing, but you require personal data for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims; and you have objected to processing, pending the verification of that objection. Where processing has been restricted on this basis, we may continue to store your personal data. However, we will only otherwise process it: with your consent; for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims; for the protection of the rights of another natural or legal person; or for reasons of important public interest.
You have the right to object to our processing of your personal data on grounds relating to your particular situation, but only to the extent that the legal basis for the processing is that the processing is necessary for: the performance of a task carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of any official authority vested in us; or the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party. If you make such an objection, we will cease to process the personal information unless we can demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your interests, rights and freedoms, or the processing is for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
You have the right to object to our processing of your personal data for direct marketing purposes (including profiling for direct marketing purposes). If you make such an objection, we will cease to process your personal data for this purpose.
If you consider that our processing of your personal information infringes data protection laws, you have a legal right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority responsible for data protection. You may do so in the EU member state of your habitual residence, your place of work or the place of the alleged infringement.
To the extent that the legal basis for our processing of your personal information is consent, you have the right to withdraw that consent at any time. Withdrawal will not affect the lawfulness of processing before the withdrawal.
You may exercise any of your rights in relation to your personal data by contacting us using the details outlined on this page.
About cookies
We and our service providers use cookies and those cookies may be stored on your computer when you visit our partner’s site, for details on cookie, please refer to cookie policy:
https://www.network-n.com/network-cookie-policy/
Our details
This website is owned and operated by Network N Limited.
We are registered in England and Wales under registration number 08063183, and our registered office is at Circus Mews House, Circus Mews, Bath, England, BA1 2PW.
Our principal place of business is at Circus Mews House, Circus Mews, Bath, England, BA1 2PW.
You can contact us:
(a) by post, using the postal address given above;
(b) by email, using this email address: mediadata@network-n.com
Contact Us
Tweets by Network_N
Network N Ltd.
Circus Mews House, Circus Mews, Bath, BA1 2PW, UK
Telephone:
(+44) 01225 531631
Subject*
...
Advertising
Publishing
Editorial
Existing Partner
Other
Name*
Email address*
* Required fields
Send Message
Sub-policy 1
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Sub-policy 2
https://www.comscore.com/About-comScore/Privacy-Policy:
Skip to main content
Enable accessibility for low vision
Open the accessibility menu
Comscore uses cookies to better understand how visitors use our site. If you continue to use our site, you are consenting to the use of these cookies. More information about cookies is available in our
privacy policy
.
Close
Toggle navigation
Solutions
Advertising
Measure and evaluate advertising across platforms
Digital
Measure digital audiences for all content types
Marketing Impact
Maximize marketing effectiveness
Movies
Measure global box office performance
Programmatic Targeting
Powerful programmatic tools to target cross-platform audiences
Social
Understand the value of social media audiences
Television
Get a complete view of television audiences
Solutions for
Automotive
Digital Media
Financial Services
FMCG
Pharmaceutical
Retail
Technology
Travel
Insights
Overview
Rankings
Blog
Presentations & Whitepapers
Join our Email List
Trending Topics
Streaming
Box Office
Sports
Featured
2025 State of Programmatic Report
Events
Overview
About
Overview
Press Room
Leadership
Investor Relations
Locations
Privacy
Security
Third-Party Accreditation
Careers
Overview
Job Opportunities
Proximic
Overview
English
Deutsch
Español (América Latina)
Español (España)
Français
Italiano
Português
Login
My Comscore Home
Comscore TV
OnDemand Essentials
Box Office Essentials
International Box Office Essentials
Shareablee
Contact us
Effective Date: November 22, 2024
Comscore, Inc. (“Comscore”, “we”, “us” or “our”) interacts with current and prospective clients, investors, and the general public via its website, www.comscore.com (“Website”), its mobile application (“Application”), and other Comscore portals. Our online research community has millions of participants who are interested in voicing their opinions as described in the applicable privacy policies and in influencing which products and services are offered.
Comscore subsidiaries operate several research panels and the ScorecardResearch business, which are not governed by this Policy and have different practices. Each panel is governed by the privacy policy that appears on the website assigned to that research panel. Some ScorecardResearch activities are described below where relevant to this Policy. For more details on ScorecardResearch, please view the ScorecardResearch privacy policy
here
.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes how we process – or, in other words, use, collect, transmit, store, share, and delete – your personal information in connection with your use of our Website, our Application, or other services that refer to or link to this Policy.
The short version
As further described below, under this Policy we may collect the following categories of information (which may be considered personal information or sensitive personal information under certain laws):
personal and online identifiers,
Internet or other electronic network activity,
general geolocation information (inferred from IP address), or precise geolocation information, and
other information about you that is linked to personal information.
We may collect information about you or your household from third parties as well. For details about our practices, please read this entire Policy.
What information is collected and why
We may collect personal information that you choose to provide to us
.
For example, if you contact us through our Website, we may collect personal identifiers (e.g., your name and contact information) as well as any other information that you voluntarily provide to us in order to respond to your inquiry or verify your identity, where necessary. We may also collect personal information that you provide to us when you register for any of our services.
Information collected automatically when you visit our Websites or use our Application.
Our Website and Application automatically create logs regarding your activity on our Website. These logs may identify the features that you use, the actions that you take, and the information that you access while on our Website or mobile Application.
The personal information collected from you in these logs may include online identifiers (e.g., IP address) and Internet or other electronic network activity including information about your browsing behavior, operating system, browser type, website preferences, your use of our Website or Application (e.g., time accessed, duration of visit, etc.). We generally use this information in statistical and aggregate formats to assess the effectiveness of our Website and Application and to better understand the priorities and interests of users of our Website and Application.
Information collected using ScorecardResearch cookies or similar technologies (“Tags”).
This Website may set tags on your browser that collect data for the ScorecardResearch service, a service offered by Full Circle Studies, Inc. (“Full Circle Studies”) which is also part of the Comscore internet ratings and research group. To view the ScorecardResearch privacy policy, please click
here
.
Information collected by third parties.
We may use third parties and service providers to obtain personal information and combine that data with other data that we collect from or about you to improve our Website, Application, products, and services, and to operate our business. Third parties may set a cookie on your computer or device when you visit the Website Application. Third parties may also collect online identifiers associated with your device such as cookie identifiers, mobile or other hardware or device identifiers, and IP addresses.
We may work with third parties, including Google Analytics, who collect information about your use of our Website, other websites, and/or online services over time for non-advertising purposes. For more information about how Google Analytics collects and uses information when you use our Website or Application, please click
here
. To opt out of Google Analytics, click
here
.
Sensitive Personal Information Collected.
Some of the personal information described above is considered sensitive personal information under certain U.S. state privacy laws.  Applying the definitions in these laws, we collect the following categories of sensitive personal information:
Personal information revealing racial or ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, union membership, a mental or physical condition or diagnosis, sex life or sexual orientation, or citizenship or citizenship status.
We use the categories of sensitive personal information listed above for the purposes described in this Policy, including some purposes that you have the right to limit as described below.
How we share the information we collect
Sharing for business purposes.
We may provide personal information to all categories of third parties and/or service providers listed in this Policy to improve our products and services and to operate our business. We may share all the categories of information listed in this Policy with other companies including Comscore affiliates, subsidiaries, or parent companies as well as third-party data enrichers, data quality aggregators and providers of data matches services:
to operate our products and services or support general operations;
to integrate the products and services of our business partners;
to use third-party cloud services to host our Website, and process and store the information we process about you; and
for any other legitimate business purpose.
Sharing for commercial purposes.
We may share information collected under this Policy with:
our customers, which include, among others, media companies including Google, brands, public relations companies, advertising networks, data analytics providers, distribution partners, and social networks, and marketing and advertising agencies; and
joint industry committees (“JICs”) involved in media audience measurement and research.
Under U.S. state privacy laws, these disclosures may qualify as “sales”. To the extent that our business model constitutes a “sale” under state privacy laws, we shared for interest-based advertising and otherwise “sold” the following categories of personal information in the last 12 months: online identifiers, Internet or other electronic network activity, general geolocation information (inferred from IP address), and other information about you that is linked to personal information. We do not “sell” or share for interest-based advertising any sensitive personal information as defined under U.S. state privacy laws. We “sell”  and share each category of information to the categories of third parties listed above.
Corporate transactions.
In the event of a corporate sale, merger, reorganization, dissolution or similar event, any personal information and data we process from you may become part of the assets we transfer or share in preparation for any such transaction. Any acquirer or successor of Comscore may continue to process personal information consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Compliance and compelled disclosures.
We may share personal information:
with public authorities to respond to subpoenas, court orders, and other legal lawful requests, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements, or as otherwise required by law;
to protect the rights, privacy, safety, and property of Comscore, our customers, our business partners, or others; and
to exercise our legal rights or defend against legal claims, to enforce our contracts, to investigate, respond to and resolve problems or inquiries (including governmental inquiries), or to permit us to pursue available remedies or limit the damages that we may sustain.
How long we keep the information collected
We store your information for as long as is reasonably necessary for the purposes listed above or as required by applicable local law.
Your choices about your personal information
Certain U.S. state and international laws provide individuals with rights related to their personal information. These consumer rights, and the definitions of “personal information” or “personal data” subject to these rights, vary by jurisdiction. Individuals may be able to exercise the following rights, subject to certain exceptions:,
The right to confirm whether Comscore processes personal information about you;
The right to access the categories and specific pieces of personal information collected, used, shared, and sold, and the categories of third parties to whom personal information is sold or shared;,
The right to correct any errors to personal information;
The right to object to the processing of personal information; and
The right to delete the personal information;
The right to opt out of (i) the “sale” of personal information as defined by applicable law or (ii) the sharing of personal information for targeted advertising;
The right to limit the processing of certain “sensitive” personal information (or to withdraw consent to such processing), as defined by applicable law; and
The right not to receive discriminatory treatment for the exercise of privacy rights in accordance with applicable law.
To exercise any of the applicable rights above, please visit our
Data Subject Rights Page
. You may also contact us by email at
DSR@comscore.com
, or by phone at 1-866-675-6141.
We may need to request additional information from you to verify your identity (e.g., your email address, cookie identifier, machine identifier, and/or device identifier) or understand the scope of your request. However, you will not be required to create an account with us to submit a request or have it fulfilled. You may designate an authorized agent to exercise your rights by contacting
DSR@comscore.com
.
For Virginia, Connecticut, or Colorado residents, if you have submitted a request that we have not reasonably fulfilled, you may contact us to appeal our decision by sending an email with the subject line “Appeal” to DSR@comscore.com.
We will not discriminate against you for exercising any of the above rights. We may, however, offer you certain financial incentives permitted by applicable law as compensation for allowing us to collect, sell, share, or maintain your personal information through your participation in our market research efforts.
For information about the number of requests received on an annual basis and additional metrics, please visit our
Data Subject Rights Page
. Please note that we may continue to use information collected during the time that you participated in the Panel, and all such information remains fully subject to, and governed by, the Privacy Policy that was effective at the time the information was collected.
For more information about your choices in relation to your personal information, including your choice to access and delete your personal information, please visit click
here
.
Interest-based advertising and market research
What is interest-based advertising?
Interest-based advertising, also known as online behavioral advertising or targeted advertising, allows advertisers to display ads tailored to your individual interests based on how you browse and shop online.
We may use third parties and service providers, as discussed in the
What information is collected and why
section, to collect information for interest-based advertising. This process may involve third parties and service providers using tagging technology, such as a cookie, on your device. These tags may collect data about your Web browsing over time and across digital properties, including information about the possible relationships among different browsers and devices. We adhere to the Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”) Self-Regulatory Principles in connection to all interest-based advertising activities.
The information collected from ScorecardResearch Tags is used for interest-based advertising purposes, where appropriate. ScorecardResearch does not use information collected in the European Union (“EU”) for interest-based advertising services.
How do I manage my preferences for interest-based advertising?
You may visit
www.aboutads.info/choices
to learn more about interest-based advertising, to opt out of our collection and transfer of Web browsing information for interest-based advertising purposes, and to opt out of the collection and use of information for this purpose by other companies that participate in industry self-regulation. Additionally, to opt out of our collection and transfer of application usage information for third parties to use for their own interest-based advertising purposes, you can use any controls that are provided for this purpose by the operating system on your mobile device. Please note that opting out will not stop advertising from appearing in your browser or in the applications you use. It may make the ads you see less relevant to your interests. You may also continue to receive interest-based advertising from other companies.
What is market research?
Market research is an organized effort to gather information about markets and customers. With the use of ScorecardResearch tags and surveys, Comscore’s market research group collects and analyzes information to provide products and services to companies around the world.  This information helps companies better understand and meet the needs of consumers.
How do I manage my preferences for market research?
To control your level of participation in our market research programs or opt out, click
here
. By opting out of our market research program, ScorecardResearch Tags will only be able to count your visit to a particular site but not identify your device beyond that count. Additionally, if your mobile device platform offers settings to limit data collection for interest-based advertising, you can use these settings to opt out of participating in our market research programs.
What does opting out of market research on your browser do?
The browser opt-out mechanisms linked above are cookie based (i.e., a cookie must be on your computer to tell our systems that you have opted out). The cookie-based method does not prevent us from identifying certain events (e.g., when a user visits a website).  The method, however, prevents us from associating that event with your browser or otherwise identifying you beyond us merely counting your visit. If you delete, block, or otherwise restrict cookies, this opt-out may not be effective. Additionally, because different computers and different Internet browsers require their own version of the opt-out cookie, you may need to perform this opt-out process on any computers and browsers that you want to be opted-out.
Other important information about your personal information
Security
. We use organizational, technical, and administrative measures to protect your personal information. For an overview of our security measures,
click here
.
Controller of Personal Information
. Global privacy laws may differentiate between the controller and processor of personal information. For additional information about Comscore’s role with regards to the processing of personal information, please see
https://www.comscore.com/About/Privacy
.
International Visitors and Information Transfers
If you visit our Website or participate in our program from locations outside of the United States, please note that any information you provide to us through your use of our Website or your participation in the program may be transferred to and processed in countries other than the country from which you accessed our Website or participated in our program, including the United States where our central database is operated. Subject to the next paragraph below, please be aware that the United States, and other countries in which your data may be maintained, may have data protection laws that are different from the laws in your country.
We take measures to help protect your personal information when it is transferred from the European Economic Area (“EEA”) and the United Kingdom to other countries. We may rely on European Commission adequacy decisions about certain countries, as applicable (see
here
). Where applicable, we rely on standard contractual clauses approved by the European Commission (see
here
) in our contracts with third parties that receive information outside the EEA and United Kingdom, or we transfer information on the basis of permissible statutory derogations.
For individuals based in the EEA, United Kingdom, or Switzerland, Comscore B.V., Hogehilweg 17, 3rd floor, 1101 CB Amsterdam, the Netherlands, is the controller for personal data collected and processed from website visitors and application, unless otherwise stated in an application-specific privacy policy. Comscore B.V. is a subsidiary of Comscore, Inc.
For more information about our policies on the EU General Data Protection Regulation 2016/679 (“GDPR”), please click
here
. Our GDPR Supplemental Policy includes additional information, which complements this Privacy Policy, relating to the processing of ‘personal data’ and the exercise of rights under the GDPR and United Kingdom data protection laws.
Comscore (including subsidiaries Creative Knowledge, Inc., Full Circle Studies, Inc., TMRG, Inc., VoiceFive, Inc., and ScorResearch, LLC) complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Comscore has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Comscore has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/.
For more information about our compliance with the DPF program, please view our
Data Privacy Framework Statement
.
Changes to our Privacy Policy
We reserve the right to modify or update this Policy periodically. If we change our practices with respect to your information, we will notify you by posting a revised Policy on  our Website with a ”Last Updated” date and  such modified or amended version of this policy shall be effective as to you and your information as of that revision date. We encourage you to revisit this Policy periodically to stay informed about our practices with respect to your information.
Authoritative Version.
When the text of this Policy is available in multiple languages, the English version is the authoritative version, except where prohibited by applicable law.
Contacting Comscore
If you have any concerns, questions, or would just like to better understand our privacy practices, please send an email to
privacy@comscore.com
. If you prefer to contact us by mail, please write to Comscore, Inc., ATTN: Privacy, 11950 Democracy Drive, Reston, VA 20190.
Join Our Email List
Stay Connected
© 2025 Comscore, Inc.
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Contact Us
Please ensure Javascript is enabled for purposes of
website accessibility
Sub-policy 4
https://www.openx.com/legal/privacy-policy/:
Learn more about our path to Net-Zero at
openx.com/sustainability
Home
»
Privacy Center
»
OpenX Ad Exchange Privacy Policy
OpenX Ad Exchange Privacy Policy
Last updated: February 11, 2025
Introduction
What personal data do we collect?
Why do we collect, use, and store this personal data?
How and to whom do we share your personal data?
How can you opt out of interest-based advertising?
What are cookies and how do we use them?
What choices and rights do you have with respect to the data we process?
How long do we retain your personal data?
What if we update this privacy policy?
How can you contact us?
1. Introduction
OpenX (“
OpenX
“, “
we
“, “
us
” or “
our
“) runs an advertising exchange (the “
Ad Exchange
”).  This means that we connect companies that offer advertising space on their websites, mobile applications, or connected television applications (called “
Publishers
” in this Privacy Policy) with brands, advertising agencies, and demand side platforms (called “
Advertising Partners
” in this Privacy Policy) looking to purchase that advertising space in order to advertise their products or services to consumers like you.
We know you may have questions and concerns about who is collecting your data, how your data is used, and how Publishers and Advertising Partners seem to know which products and services you may be interested in as you engage online.  We’ve designed this Privacy Policy to help answer those questions with respect to the data that flows through our systems, and to make sure you know how to take action to prevent or limit our collection and use of your data for interest-based advertising (sometimes called “targeted advertising” or “cross-context behavioral advertising”) if you choose to do so by clicking
here
.
We encourage you to read the whole Privacy Policy, because it provides important information about how we may process your data, and the choices or rights you may have with respect to our processing of your data.  In the meantime, here are some key takeaways:
We collect data about you from Publishers, Advertising Partners, and third party data providers.
This data may include personal information about you such as your device identifiers, location, browsing history, and specific interests, and it may be collected from a variety of partners, such as Publishers operating websites and apps.
We use this data to understand your online activity and interests over time so we can serve you relevant ads.
Using cookies and other persistent identifiers that track your online activity, we collect data about you across different websites and apps, and across different devices. So, we may know you visited a website on Monday from your desktop computer to look at a product, returned to the website on Tuesday from your mobile phone to add the product to your check-out basket, and finally completed your purchase of the product on Wednesday from your tablet. We use this data to learn about your interests over time and understand what products and services may be most relevant to you.
We share this data with third parties.
We share the data we collect about you, and the information we learn from it, with the Advertising Partners that use our Ad Exchange to help them decide whether, where, and how to serve (or re-serve) advertisements for particular products or services to you. We may also share some of your data with trusted third party data providers and service providers.
We don’t know your name, but we do know your online identifier.
None of the data we collect or share about you via our Ad Exchange is connected to your clear-text name, contact information, or other information that could directly identify you as an individual.  But, it is connected to the cookies and other persistent identifiers that are affiliated with your unique online activity.  So, while we (and the partners who use our Ad Exchange) may know about the interests and online activity of device ABC123 and use it to serve that device ads as described above, we don’t know that device ABC123 is used by a person with your name.
You can opt out of interest-based advertising.
While we strongly believe that our services help foster a healthy Internet, grow a strong economy, and enhance your online experience, we understand that not everyone wants to receive interest-based (i.e., “targeted” or “cross-context behavioral”) advertisements. You can opt out by clicking
here
or by following the instructions in
this section
.
If you do opt out, you should understand that you may still receive the same amount of advertisements from Advertising Partners using our Ad Exchange (or other ad exchanges) as you engage online.  But, at least for advertisements served via our Ad Exchange to your opted out device(s) or browser(s), none of those advertisements will be tailored to your specific interests over time.
To learn more about our collection, use, and disclosure of your data, and your choices or rights with respect to our processing of your data, please scroll down to read the rest of this Privacy Policy.  If you have any questions as you do, you can always contact us
here
.
As you read our Privacy Policy, please also remember that the Publishers and Advertising Partners you interact with as you engage online and in the real world may have their own privacy policies that govern how they collect and use your data, including when they may share your data with advertising partners like us. These policies and practices may differ from what you read in our Privacy Policy. To fully understand how your data is being collected, used, and shared, you should always carefully read the privacy policy of any website you access, any app you use, and any social network page through which you share information.
2.
What personal data do we collect?
Unless you contact us directly, we do not knowingly collect information that directly identifies you, such as your clear-text (i.e., unhashed) name, physical address, email address, phone number, online usernames, or user passwords. But, we may collect the following categories of personal data about you from Publishers, Advertising Partners, and third party data providers that partner with us to serve you advertisements:
Unique online identifiers
These are persistent identifiers that help us identify you across devices and over time, such as your IP address, cookie ID, mobile advertising ID, hashed email address, and user agent string
Online and offline activity and interests (including inferences)
This includes information about your online activity and interests, such as your browsing history and online behavior
This may also include information about your offline activity and interests, such as your purchase history
And, this may include information derived or inferred from your online and offline activity and interests, such as your likelihood to be interested in buying a particular product, using a particular service, or visiting a particular website
Geolocation information
This is information about your or your device’s location, such as your country, region, metro, zip, or postal code, or geographic coordinates, typically as inferred from your IP address
Browser, device, and service information
This is information about the devices you are using to engage online, such as your browser or device type (e.g., Google Chrome, iPhone), screen dimensions, operating system, and preferred language
Ad reporting and delivery information
This is information about the advertisements you have been served and how you interacted with them, such as the size and format of advertisements you were served and whether you clicked on them
As described above, we collect this information primarily using cookies and other persistent identifiers that track your online activity. You can learn more about these technologies in
this section
.
We will also collect your personal data if you visit our website or contact us for any reason, although we will not use this data for advertising via our Ad Exchange. Please view our
Website Privacy Policy
to learn more.
3.
Why do we collect, use, and store this personal data?
Depending on where you live, we may need a valid legal basis to collect, use, and store your personal data. If we do, depending on the circumstances, our valid legal basis may be: (i) that you have given us permission to process your data by consenting to our processing or by choosing not to opt out of our processing after receiving notice of our processing activities (we’ll collectively refer to this legal basis below as “consent”), in which case you can always withdraw your consent or opt out of our processing by contacting us
here
(note, though, that withdrawing or opting out will not affect the lawfulness of processing based on consent before a withdrawal or opt out); (ii) that it is in our legitimate interests to process your data, taking into consideration your interests, rights, and expectations (we’ll refer to this legal basis below as “legitimate interest”); or (iii) that we are legally required to process your data (we’ll refer to this legal basis below as “legal requirement”).
When we are legally allowed to process your personal data, we may do so for the following purposes, with the caveat that some of our processing activities vary depending on where you live:
To facilitate non-interest based advertising
We may help serve you an ad on one of our Publisher’s online properties based solely on information you have provided directly to that Publisher
Our legal basis for this purpose is legitimate interest
To facilitate interest-based advertising
We may help serve you an ad on one of our Publisher’s online properties based on information you have provided to that Publisher, in addition to information we have collected independently or from third parties, including other Publishers, Advertising Partners, and third party data providers
You can opt out of interest-based advertising (sometimes called “cross-context behavioral” or “targeted” advertising) by clicking
here
Our legal basis for this purpose is consent
To understand your activity and preferences over time
We may use the data we collect (whether directly or from our partners) to learn about your online activity across sites, apps, and devices over time and infer information about your online and real-world preferences (e.g., we may infer that device ABC123 is used by a female in the New York Metro area interested in buying new shoes)
We only maintain information about your activity and preferences for the last 90 days (at most), and we use this information only to improve our ability to serve interest-based advertisements
Although we can’t control our partners’ actions, we also include restrictions in our agreements with our Advertising Partners and third party data providers requiring them to limit their use of this information, to the extent it is shared with them
You can opt out of this kind of data processing, which facilitates interest-based advertising, by clicking
here
Our legal basis for this purpose is consent
To control the content and frequency of ads
Whenever we help serve you an ad, we may use real-time information about the context in which it will be shown to help make sure the ad is relevant to you and delivered in a format that will work on your device
We also take steps designed to make sure that you are being shown a reasonable amount of ads, that those ads do not contain malware and otherwise meet our ad standards, and that you are not receiving the same ads too frequently
Our legal basis for this processing is consent or legitimate interest, depending on the circumstances
To measure ad performance
Whenever we help serve you an ad, we may measure the delivery and performance of the ad to understand whether it displayed correctly; how long you had the opportunity to see it; and how, if at all, you interacted with it
We use this information to provide reporting to our Publishers and Advertising Partners so that they can understand how their ad campaigns are working or can be improved
Our legal basis for this processing is consent or legitimate interest, depending on the circumstances
To build and improve our products, features, and models
We use data to build and improve our products and features, including by building and improving models and algorithms through machine learning
Our legal basis for this processing is legitimate interest
To respond to valid legal requests and protect our legal interests
In rare instances, we may be required to produce your data in response to a valid legal request from a governmental, law enforcement, or other legal entity
It is also possible, although unlikely, that we may need to produce your data to protect our rights and property, or to protect someone’s safety
If we are required to produce your data in either of these circumstances (or any similar circumstances), we will limit our response to the information required to resolve the legal request or situation
Our legal basis for this processing is legitimate interest or legal requirement, depending on the circumstances
When we process your personal data for one of these purposes, we do so in accordance with our robust privacy program, including by taking measures to securely store and transmit your data and by adhering to our
retention limits
.
4.
How and to whom do we share your personal data?
We may disclose the information that we collect about you to the following third parties, for the following reasons:
Advertising Partners and third party data providers
As described throughout this Privacy Policy, we pass data to our Advertising Partners, subject to data use restrictions, so that they can combine this information with other information they have independently collected to determine whether to serve (or re-serve) you an ad, and so that they can understand how well their advertising campaigns are working
We may also pass data to trusted third party data aggregators or data partners, subject to data use restrictions, so that they can combine this information with other information they have independently collected to understand, and in some cases help us understand, your online activity and preferences across sites, apps, and devices over time
Some of these transfers of data may considered “sales” or “sharing” of data under privacy laws applicable to you; you can opt out of any “sales” or “sharing” of data by clicking
here
Service providers
We share certain data with contracted vendors, subject to data use restrictions, so that they can perform functions on our behalf, such as fraud and malware prevention, identification of invalid traffic, and data storage and hosting; a list of our service providers is available
here
Affiliates and potential acquirers
We may share data amongst affiliate companies in the OpenX group for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy; a  list of our affiliates is available
here
We may also share data in connection with an actual or proposed sale or transfer of all or a part of our business or assets, corporate merger, consolidation, or bankruptcy, including with our advisers and any prospective purchaser’s advisers and with the new owners of the business
Regulators, law enforcement entities, and other legal actors
In rare instances, we may share data with regulatory, governmental, law enforcement, courts with competent jurisdictions, emergency services, or other legal entities or public authorities in response to a valid legal request, to protect our rights or property, to protect someone’s safety, or to meet national security or law enforcement requirements
If we are required to produce your data to these entities, we will limit our response to the information required to resolve the legal request or situation
International transfers
OpenX complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. OpenX has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. OpenX has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, OpenX commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) and the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of human resources data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF in the context of the employment relationship.
If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the applicable Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit the
Data Privacy Framework website
.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over OpenX’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF) and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF).
If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider (free of charge)
here
.
Under certain conditions, more fully described on the DPF website
here
, you may be entitled to invoke binding arbitration when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted. In cases of onward transfer to third parties (e.g., instances where OpenX transfers personal data to a third party partner, service provider or an agent which processes such data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles), OpenX is generally liable for the acts of the third party that are in violation of the DPF Principles.
In parallel to adhering to Data Privacy Framework, in the event that personal data collected from a UK or EEA data subject is transferred outside of the UK or the EEA to an organization in a country which is not subject to an adequacy decision by the EU Commission or considered adequate as determined by applicable data protection laws, we take additional steps to ensure your personal data is adequately protected (e.g., by way of EU Commission-approved Standard Contractual Clauses or by relying on other data transfer mechanisms approved under applicable data protection laws). We are also committed to conducting data transfer impact assessments and adopting any supplementary measures required to mitigate any risks to you identified in such an assessment. A copy of the relevant mechanism can be obtained for your review on request by contacting us
here
.
We regularly monitor updates to the Data Privacy Framework and other relevant international data protection standards to ensure continued compliance and promptly implement any required adjustments to our data transfer practices.
5.
How can you opt out of interest-based advertising?
OpenX adheres to the Digital Advertising Alliance (“
DAA
”) Self-Regulatory Principles in the United States (“U.S.”), the European Digital Advertising Alliance (“
EDAA
”) Principles in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), and the IAB Europe OBA Framework.  These principles and framework address interest-based advertising, also called “cross-context behavioral” or “targeted” advertising, which our services facilitate.  As described throughout this Privacy Policy, OpenX collects the types of data described in
Section 2
across multiple devices and across websites and apps over time, in order to use and transfer such data to our partners to facilitate  interest-based advertising.
You can request to opt out of our interest-based advertising services – and the interest-based advertising services of other companies that adhere to the principles and framework listed above – by taking the steps listed below. Please remember that even if you take some or all of these steps, some information may still be collected about you as you engage online, and you may still receive the same number of advertisements. But we will not collect or use data collected from your opted out browser or device to tailor the online ads you receive based on data collected over time from different websites, apps, and devices (at least for data collected and advertisements received via our Ad Exchange).
You’ll see that there are multiple steps listed. That’s because, as described throughout this Privacy Policy, interest-based advertising services involve the collection of your data across multiple devices and via multiple mechanisms. As a result, because cookies and other persistent identifiers cannot be read between different browsers or devices, you will need to opt out on each device and browser you use, and may need to take special steps to opt out of the collection of certain kinds of data.
To opt out on a browser (e.g., as you engage on websites):
Cookies and Similar Technologies.
Cookies and similar technologies, like web beacons and pixels, may be used to collect data about you as you browse the web.  If you live in the EEA, you can learn more about and opt out of this kind of data collection by companies, including OpenX, that adhere to the European DAA Principles at
www.youronlinechoices.com
.  If you live outside of the EEA, you can learn more about and opt out of this kind of data collection by companies, including OpenX, that adhere to the DAA’s self-regulatory programs at
https://youradchoices.com/control
. As an opt out alternative, you can also download a browser or extension that supports the Global Privacy Control by visiting
this website
.
Please note
that in order for your opt-out choice to be effective using the DAA’s tools, you must ensure that your browser is first set to accept third-party cookies such as the OpenX opt-out cookie. Some browsers block third-party cookies by default, and you may need to change your browser settings to accept third-party cookies before opting out. Additionally, if you later use a different device or browser, or erase cookies from your browser, you may need to renew your opt-out choice.
Local Storage or Cache.
Companies may use the local storage or cache in your browser to collect information about you as you browse the Internet. You can opt-out of this kind of data collection by (1) using any tools provided by your browser to clear local storage and the browser cache, and (2) turning on any “Do Not Track” header setting offered by your browser. Please note that you must complete both of these steps in order to complete the opt out process. As an opt out alternative, you can also download a browser or extension that supports the Global Privacy Control by visiting
this website
.
To opt out on a cell phone or mobile device (as you use mobile apps):
You can opt out of the collection of data for interest-based advertising on your mobile device, for OpenX and other companies participating in industry self-regulation, by downloading the DAA’s AppChoices application from the Android or iOS app store. Alternatively, or if you live outside of the United States (in which case you may not have access to this application), you can turn off the “Allow Apps to Request to Track” setting in your iOS settings or turn on the “opt out of interest-based ads” setting in your Android settings to limit the collection of your data for interest-based advertising. You can find additional information and more detailed instructions
here
.
To opt out of the collection of precise location data (as you use your mobile device):
You may wish to opt out of the collection of your precise location data, to the extent Publishers collect and share such data with advertising partners.  This would mean that certain data related to your online activity and general location (such as your city) could be collected, but data indicating your precise location (such as your precise GPS coordinates) could not be collected. You can do this by using the “location services” controls in your mobile device’s settings.
To opt out on a connected television (as you watch TV on apps):
You may be able to opt out of the collection of data for interest-based advertising on your connected or “smart” TV or set top box by visiting your device’s settings menu. You can find additional information and more detailed instructions
here
.
6.
What are cookies and how do we use them?
What are cookies?
A cookie is a very small text document, containing a string of characters that uniquely identifies your web browser. Cookies are created when your browser loads a particular website. The website sends information to the browser which then creates a text file. This allows the browser to remember the websites you visit, and that information is shared with other parties such as our Advertising Partners. This also allows us to collect information about your browsing habits over time in order to facilitate interest-based advertising and make advertising more relevant to you and your interests, as described throughout this Privacy Policy.
In other words, when you visit a Publisher’s website or a digital property, we may assign a random, unique identifier, specific to OpenX, to your browser or device.  Using that OpenX identifier, our Ad Exchange can automatically recognize your browser or device the next time it visits another website or digital property owned by a Publisher we work with.  This means that, over time, our Ad Exchange can track your online activity to learn about your online browsing behavior and preferences. The Publishers and Advertising Partners we work with can also map their own unique identifiers against our OpenX identifier via a process called “cookie syncing,” so that they can use data they have collected independently on our Ad Exchange. In the case of Advertising Partners, the aggregated insights cookie syncing facilitates may influence their decision to bid (or not bid) on opportunities to advertise products or services to you. For example, certain Advertising Partners may be more willing to serve you an advertisement for a particular product if they know, via insights learned from cookie syncing, that you have seen and clicked on advertisements for the same or similar products in the past.
We also use cookies for frequency capping, meaning that we may use data they collect to limit the number of times you see an advertisement, as well as to help measure the effectiveness of our Advertising Partners’ advertising campaigns. Find out more about the use of cookies on
https://www.aboutidentifiers.org
.
What cookies do we use?
Cookie ‘i’
–
this is the user / market cookie. It includes a random string created to recognize your device for the purpose of delivering advertisements, as well as the timestamp of the string’s creation. By matching this cookie with data collected by Advertising Partners, we and our Advertising Partners can deliver more relevant ads to you. This cookie is stored on your device for 1 year and is refreshed for the next year on each bid request.
Cookie ‘pd’
–
this cookie stores information about which other third parties the user cookie (‘i’ cookie) has been synced with to reduce the amount of user matching done on your device.
This cookie is stored on your device for 15 days.
Cookie ‘OX_dnt’
– this cookie acts as a flag which we set if you indicate that you want to opt-out of interest-based advertising. Please see the information above on opting out of interest-based advertising. This cookie is stored on your device for 5 years.
Third parties
Third parties, such as our Publishers and Advertising Partners, may also serve cookies on your computer or mobile device to facilitate advertising, analytics, and other functions. They may also use information about your visits to different online properties to provide you with more relevant advertisements and measure the effectiveness of their advertising campaigns. We do not have access to or control over these cookies and encourage you to review the privacy and cookie policies of any companies you engage with online to find out about their data collection practices, including how they may use cookies.
7.
What choices and rights do you have with respect to the data we process?
Depending on the country or state where you live, you have different legal rights with respect to your personal data and how we may process it. We’ve provided more detail on these rights for consumers in the UK/EEA and certain U.S. states below, but you can always contact us
here
to learn more.
UK/EEA based individuals
UK- and EEA-based individuals have the right to ask us for a copy of your personal data; to correct, delete or restrict our processing of your personal data; and to obtain the personal data we have collected from you in a structured, machine readable format. In addition, you can object to the processing of your personal data in some circumstances (in particular, where we don’t have to process the data to meet a contractual or other legal requirement).
These rights may be limited, for example if fulfilling your request would reveal personal data about another person, or if you ask us to delete information which we are required by law or have compelling legitimate interests to keep. If you have unresolved concerns, you have the right to complain to a data protection authority where you live, work or believe a breach has taken place. You’ll find contact details for your data protection authority
here
if you are an EEA based individual or
here
if you are a UK based individual.
If you would like to exercise any of the rights listed above, please reach us
here
.
U.S. based individuals
Residents of certain U.S. states may exercise one or more of the following rights regarding your personal data, subject to certain exceptions and limitations:
The right to confirm whether we have processed your personal data.
The
right to know and access, in a portable format that is accessible to you, the categories and specific pieces of personal data we collect, use, share, and sell about you, the categories of sources from which we collected your personal data, our purposes for collecting, using, sharing, and selling your personal data, the categories of your personal data that we have shared or sold for a business purpose, and the categories of third parties with which we have shared or sold your personal data. Oregon residents also have the right to obtain a list of third parties (other than our service providers) to which we have disclosed personal data.
The right to correct inaccuracies related to the personal data we have collected from or about you.
The right to request that we delete the personal data we have collected from or about you.
The right to opt out of our processing and sharing of your personal data for purposes of interest-based advertising, also called “cross-context behavioral advertising” or “targeted advertising,” which our services facilitate, as well as the right to opt out of our sales of your personal data.
The right not to be discriminated or retaliated against for exercising any of these data rights.
Certain states provide residents with additional rights related to “sensitive” personal data. OpenX may process limited personal data related to children within our Child-Safe Marketplace, and this data may be considered “sensitive” in certain states. You can learn more about data processing within our Child-Safe Marketplace in our
Child-Safe Marketplace Privacy Policy
. Other than as detailed in our Child-Safe Marketplace Privacy Policy, OpenX does not knowingly collect sensitive personal data as a business, data controller, or equivalent entity.
To exercise any of the above rights, please reach us
here
or call us at (855) 231-3834 . You may be asked to submit verifying information in certain circumstances, as described below. Depending on your state, if you have submitted a request that we have not fulfilled, you may appeal our decision by contacting us
here
.
Verification Process and Required Information
:
Because most of the information we store is linked only to online identifiers, and cannot identify your name or contact information, we may need to request additional information from you to verify your identity or understand the scope of your request. Such additional information may include your online identifier (e.g., your cookie or mobile advertising ID), your state of residence, and some proof that the devices that have the cookie or mobile advertising ID you provide are yours, such as a screenshot of the applicable cookie or of a screen that displays the mobile advertising ID or other documentation that can verify you.
Authorized Agent
:
You may designate an authorized agent to make a data subject request on your behalf by verifying your identity and providing written permission to your agent to make the request for you.
Minors’ Personal Data
:
We do not sell the personal data of consumers that we know to be under 18 years of age or share such data for purposes of interest-based advertising (also known as “targeted” or “cross-context behavioral” advertising).
Collection, Sharing, and Sale of Personal Data:
In the last 12 months, we collected the categories of personal data described above in the “
What personal data do we collect?
” section of this Privacy Policy, which correspond to the following categories of personal data under California law: (1) personal and online identifiers; (2) commercial or transactions information; (3) Internet or other electronic network activity information; (4) geolocation information; (4) inferences about your predicted characteristics and preferences; and (5) other information about you that is linked to the “personal information” or “personal data” we collect.
In the last 12 months, we collected these categories of personal data from Publishers, Advertising Partners, service providers (e.g., fraud prevention services), and third party data providers (e.g., consumer data resellers).
In the last 12 months, we collected personal data for our commercial and business purposes, as described in more detail above in the “
Why do we collect, use, and store this personal data?
” section of this Privacy Policy. As described in that section, we sell and share personal data for interest-based advertising purposes (also known as “cross-context behavioral” or “targeted” advertising). However, we do not sell or use personal data for profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects on you.
In the last 12 months, we sold, shared, or disclosed personal data we collected to the categories of third parties described above in the “
How and to whom do we share your personal data?
” section of this Privacy Policy. In particular, we “sold” (as a “sale” is defined under state privacy laws) or shared for interest-based advertising purposes each category of personal data we collected to Advertising Partners and third party data providers (e.g., consumer data resellers). We also disclosed each category of personal data we collected with our service providers and affiliates as well as, in limited instances, governmental entities for our business purposes.
In the last 12 months, we stored and retained personal data in accordance with the retention periods described below in the “
How long do we retain your personal data
” section of this Privacy Policy.
Information About Past Year’s California Requests:
In 2023, with respect to requests from California residents submitted under the California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended (“
CCPA
”), OpenX:
Received 26 requests to know or access, complied with all of them in an average of 34 days and a median of 42 days, and denied none of them.
Received 32 requests to delete, complied with all of them in an average of 18 days and a median of 23 days, and denied none of them.
Received 58 unique requests to opt-out, complied with all of them in an average of 15 days and a median of 15 days, and denied none of them.
Received 8 requests that did not provide a specific type of request, responded to all of them in an average of 17 days and a median of 17 days, and denied none of them.
In some instances, although we have not denied a request, we cannot fully complete the data subject’s requested action due to an inability to connect the data in our systems to the data provided by the data subject. In such instances, we request additional information from the data subject to attempt to verify the request.
8.
How long do we retain your personal data?
We may keep each data point we collect about you for a maximum of 90 days from the last date that we received it.  For example, if we collect data indicating that you visited a particular website on day 0, we may keep that data until day 90 (at the latest) unless we collect data indicating that you visited that particular website again within that initial 90 day period (in which case, the 90 day clock would reset). For most categories of data, this is limited to 14 days.
Additionally, we’ve set retention limits on the cookies that may be set on your devices. In particular, the market cookie (“i”) used for OpenX’s device recognition is set to remain on your device for a maximum of one year, while the cookie implemented to recognize your opt-out from interest-based advertising is set to last for five years, should you choose to opt out.
9.
What if we update this privacy policy?
We reserve the right to update this Privacy Policy at any time.  If we do so, we will post the updated policy here and update the “Last Updated” date. We may also notify you in other ways from time to time about the processing of your personal data.
10.
How can you contact us?
If you are a UK or EEA based individual, the data controller for your personal data is OpenX Poland Sp. z o.o.
If you are a U.S. based individual, the business, data controller, or equivalent entity that controls how your data may be processed is OpenX Technologies Inc.
If you have questions about this Privacy Policy or wish to contact us for any reason in relation to our personal data processing, you can contact us
here
.
If you are a UK or EEA based individual, you can also reach us at:
OpenX Poland sp. z o.o.
Attention: Legal Department
Aleja 29 Listopada 20
31-401 Krakow
Poland
If you are an U.S. based individual, you can also reach us at:
OpenX Technologies Inc.
Attention: Legal Department
177 E. Colorado Blvd., #3039
Pasadena, CA 91105
United States
You may also contact our data protection officer at
dpo@openx.com
or by calling us at (855) 231-3834.
Sub-policy 5
https://www.pulsepoint.com/privacy-policy.html:
Page Not Found
The page you are looking for doesn't exist or has been moved.
Go to homepage
Your Choice on Cookies
We and our
58
partners store and access personal data, like browsing data or unique identifiers, on your device. Selecting Accept All
enables tracking technologies to support the purposes shown under we and our partners process data to provide. Selecting Accept Essential or withdrawing your consent will disable them. If trackers are disabled, some content and ads you see may not be as relevant to you. You can resurface this menu to change your choices or withdraw consent at any time by clicking the Manage Preferences link on the bottom of the webpage  .Your choices will have effect within our Website. For more details, refer to our Privacy Policy.
See our cookies Notice
We and our partners process data to provide:
Use precise geolocation data. Actively scan device characteristics for identification. Store and/or access information on a device. Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development.
See our List of Partners
Customize Choices
Accept Essential
Accept All
About Your Privacy
We process your data to deliver content or advertisements and measure the delivery of such content or advertisements to extract insights about our website. We share this information with our partners on the basis of consent and legitimate interest. You may exercise your right to consent or object to a legitimate interest, based on a specific purpose below or at a partner level in the link under each purpose. These choices will be signaled to our vendors participating in the Transparency and Consent Framework.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Store and/or access information on a device
Cookies, device or similar online identifiers (e.g. login-based identifiers, randomly assigned identifiers, network based identifiers) together with other information (e.g. browser type and information, language, screen size, supported technologies etc.) can be stored or read on your device to recognise it each time it connects to an app or to a website, for one or several of the purposes presented here.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development
Use limited data to select advertising
48 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Advertising presented to you on this service can be based on limited data, such as the website or app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times an ad is presented to you).
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Create profiles for personalised advertising
41 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service (such as forms you submit, content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (for example, information from your previous activity on this service and other websites or apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (that might include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present advertising that appears more relevant based on your possible interests by this and other entities.
View Illustrations
Use profiles to select personalised advertising
41 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Advertising presented to you on this service can be based on your advertising profiles, which can reflect your activity on this service or other websites or apps (like the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects.
View Illustrations
Create profiles to personalise content
11 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service (for instance, forms you submit, non-advertising content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (such as your previous activity on this service or other websites or apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (which might for example include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present content that appears more relevant based on your possible interests, such as by adapting the order in which content is shown to you, so that it is even easier for you to find content that matches your interests.
View Illustrations
Use profiles to select personalised content
9 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Content presented to you on this service can be based on your content personalisation profiles, which can reflect your activity on this or other services (for instance, the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects. This can for example be used to adapt the order in which content is shown to you, so that it is even easier for you to find (non-advertising) content that matches your interests.
View Illustrations
Measure advertising performance
53 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information regarding which advertising is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine how well an advert has worked for you or other users and whether the goals of the advertising were reached. For instance, whether you saw an ad, whether you clicked on it, whether it led you to buy a product or visit a website, etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of advertising campaigns.
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Measure content performance
15 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information regarding which content is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine whether the (non-advertising) content e.g. reached its intended audience and matched your interests. For instance, whether you read an article, watch a video, listen to a podcast or look at a product description, how long you spent on this service and the web pages you visit etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of (non-advertising) content that is shown to you.
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
35 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Reports can be generated based on the combination of data sets (like user profiles, statistics, market research, analytics data) regarding your interactions and those of other users with advertising or (non-advertising) content to identify common characteristics (for instance, to determine which target audiences are more receptive to an ad campaign or to certain contents).
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Develop and improve services
50 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service, such as your interaction with ads or content, can be very helpful to improve products and services and to build new products and services based on user interactions, the type of audience, etc. This specific purpose does not include the development or improvement of user profiles and identifiers.
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
Use limited data to select content
8 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Content presented to you on this service can be based on limited data, such as the website or app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type, or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times a video or an article is presented to you).
View Illustrations
Object to Legitimate Interests
Remove Objection
List of IAB Vendors‎
Use precise geolocation data
With your acceptance, your precise location (within a radius of less than 500 metres) may be used in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Actively scan device characteristics for identification
With your acceptance, certain characteristics specific to your device might be requested and used to distinguish it from other devices (such as the installed fonts or plugins, the resolution of your screen) in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
Your data can be used to monitor for and prevent unusual and possibly fraudulent activity (for example, regarding advertising, ad clicks by bots), and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely. It can also be used to correct any problems you, the publisher or the advertiser may encounter in the delivery of content and ads and in your interaction with them.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Always Active
Certain information (like an IP address or device capabilities) is used to ensure the technical compatibility of the content or advertising, and to facilitate the transmission of the content or ad to your device.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Always Active
Information about your activity on this service may be matched and combined with other information relating to you and originating from various sources (for instance your activity on a separate online service, your use of a loyalty card in-store, or your answers to a survey), in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
In support of the purposes explained in this notice, your device might be considered as likely linked to other devices that belong to you or your household (for instance because you are logged in to the same service on both your phone and your computer, or because you may use the same Internet connection on both devices).
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
Your device might be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends when accessing the Internet (for instance, the IP address of your Internet connection or the type of browser you are using) in support of the purposes exposed in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
The choices you make regarding the purposes and entities listed in this notice are saved and made available to those entities in the form of digital signals (such as a string of characters). This is necessary in order to enable both this service and those entities to respect such choices.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 6
https://www.sovrn.com/privacy-policy/:
Resources
Support
Contact
Knowledge Base
Status
Sign In
Sign Up
Back
Resources
Support
Contact
Knowledge Base
Status
Trust Center
Overview
Legal
Master Services Agreement
Data Processing Addendum (Sovrn as Data Importer)
Standard Contractual Clause Selections and Addendum
Data Processing Addendum (Sovrn as the Exporter)
Standard Contractual Clause Selections and Addendum
Data Processing Addendum Archive
Website Terms of Use
Referral Terms
Privacy
About Our Cookies
Your Privacy Choices
Law Enforcement Request Policy
Subprocessors
Third-party providers
Privacy Policy
CCPA Metrics
Audience Segments
Service Policies
Advertising Supply Policy
Advertising Demand Policy
Take Down Policy
Commerce Publisher Code of Conduct
Sovrn Legal
About Our Cookies
Your Privacy Choices
Law Enforcement Request Policy
Subprocessors
Third-party providers
Privacy Policy
CCPA Metrics
Audience Segments
Overview
Legal
Master Services Agreement
Data Processing Addendum (Sovrn as Data Importer)
Standard Contractual Clause Selections and Addendum
Data Processing Addendum (Sovrn as the Exporter)
Standard Contractual Clause Selections and Addendum
Data Processing Addendum Archive
Website Terms of Use
Referral Terms
Privacy
About Our Cookies
Your Privacy Choices
Law Enforcement Request Policy
Subprocessors
Third-party providers
Privacy Policy
– Our Commitment to Good Advertising Practices
– Information We Collect
– How We Collect Information
– How We Use Information
– Our Information Sharing Practices
– How To Opt Out
– Children’s Privacy
– Retention of Personal Information
– Security
– Country and US State Specific Disclosures
– Changes in this Privacy Policy
– Contact Us
– Revision Log
CCPA Metrics
Audience Segments
Service Policies
Advertising Supply Policy
Advertising Demand Policy
Take Down Policy
Commerce Publisher Code of Conduct
Privacy Policy
Last Updated November 18, 2022
Effective Date: December 19, 2023
Sovrn provides data and monetization tools to our customers that allow for revenue generation through digital advertising, affiliate network marketing and commercial data products. We believe in transparency and respecting consumer choice as a foundation of trust, so we have crafted this Privacy Policy to help you understand how we handle Personal Information, and your privacy choices.
Our products are used on websites and other internet-connected services (such as smart TV’s and mobile devices). A more in-depth description of our Services can be found at our
Publisher Products
site.
This
“Privacy Policy”
describes how Sovrn collects, uses, and shares personal information in connection with (i) Sovrn Services; and (ii) our public-facing business websites found at
www.sovrn.com
and other websites that we own and operate that link to this Privacy Policy (collectively, the
“Site”
).
If unsure about any of the information provided, please reach out to privacy@sovrn.com.
Definition of Terms
Throughout this Privacy Policy, we use some phrases that are unique to our business or the technology underlying our Services or may just be new to you. The following are definitions of some of the key terms that you’ll need to know to make it easier to understand this Privacy Policy:
“Advertiser”
means an entity providing ads to be placed on Publisher websites.
“Interest-Based Advertising”
is an umbrella term used throughout this Privacy Policy to indicate cross-device targeting, targeted advertising, cross-contextual behavioral advertising, and similar activities related to the use of profiles to understand the browsing and/or purchasing behaviors of consumers.  For more information, please see the
BBB National Programs
site.
“Non-Personal Information”
means information that is not associated with or linked to Personal Information including aggregate or de-identified information.
“Personal Information”
means any information that can be used to directly or indirectly identify a natural person, such as contact information (i.e., name, address, e-mail address, and/or phone number), and/or information that uniquely and persistently identifies a browser or device, such as an IP address, mobile advertising identifier, unique online  identifiers, email address that has been hashed to generate an alphanumeric identifier, or combination of information about a browser or device (such as IP address and browser type/settings).
“Publishers”
are websites or publications that use Sovrn Services, or natural persons who interact with Sovrn on behalf of such websites or publications.  Publishers are also Sovrn customers.
“Readers”
are individuals who visit our Publishers’ websites or the Site.
“Sovrn”
or
“we,” “us,”
or
“our”
means Sovrn, Inc. with our affiliates (including those not under the Sovrn brand).
Description of Sovrn Services
The Sovrn Services that collect information from Readers are
Exchange and Ad Management for
Interest-based Advertising
;
Commerce for affiliate network marketing, shopping galleries and price comparisons; and
Signal for viewer engagement metrics.
Sovrn is a data broker, allowing us to provide commercial data products (
“Data”
) to our customers, which are also part of the Services. As a data broker we may share your Personal Information with other parties for our commercial interests. Please refer to “
Country and US State Specific Disclosures
” for more information related to specific privacy rights related to disclosures through our data brokerage.
In order to provide the Services, we collect Personal Information from our Publishers as described in our Publisher contractual agreements, and this Privacy Policy.
Please note that the Services may contain links to websites or content operated and maintained by third parties over which we have no control. We encourage review of the privacy policies of such third-party websites and content before disclosing any information to them.
In addition to the Services, Sovrn collects Personal Information through interactions with the Site. By visiting or submitting Personal Information through the Site, you acknowledge the processing of your Personal Information in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
Our Commitment to Good Advertising Practices
Sovrn supports industry self-regulatory principles and endorses industry recognized practices and self-regulatory standards.
Sovrn follows and adheres to the industry Self-Regulatory Principles of the
Digital Advertising Alliance
(“DAA”).
Sovrn also adheres to the
Interactive Advertising Bureau
(“IAB”) Code of Conduct, and actively participates in the
IAB Europe Transparency & Consent Framework
(TCF 2.0). We comply with IAB’s Specifications and Policies under vendor identification number 13.
For more information about industry self-regulation of Interest-Based Advertising, please visit:
www.networkadvertising.org
and
www.aboutads.info
.
Information We Collect
The information we collect allows us to see browsing habits at an individual device level, but we do not attempt to identify the exact individual who is browsing. Here we outline the types of information used in Interest-Based Advertising, as well as what to expect when visiting our Site.
Sovrn Services and Site collects both Personal Information and Non-Personal Information. Sovrn does not collect personally identifiable information (
“PII”
) about Readers that could directly identify them to Sovrn, such as names, surnames, plain-text email addresses, physical addresses, or phone numbers, unless provided to us through the Site when requesting materials or information from us. For clarity, none of the information collected through the Site is used in our commercial Data products.
The following provides more detail into the types of Personal Information we may collect (and in some instances purchase from partners) and use in conjunction with the Sovrn Services and Site:
Identifier
Description
Used by
Cookie ID
A randomly generated identifier (including those created by Sovrn) that is stored on a browser and allows us to understand Reader browsing behavior, without knowing the exact identity of the individual. Also known as a third-party cookie.
All Services and Site
Connected television identifier (CTV ID)
Examples of connected televisions (CTV) include Xbox, PlayStation, Roku, Amazon Fire TV, Apple TV, and devices provided by manufacturers such as Samsung and Vizio. A CTV ID is a unique identifier that is generated by the CTV and is used for various purposes, including Interest-Based Advertising.
Exchange
Device information
Device information can include your browser agent, browser type, operating system, device type, use of ad blocking tools, and information about the possible relationships among different browsers and devices.
All Services and Site
Hashed email
Hashing is a way of making a piece of data, like an email address, into a hexadecimal string so that it is no longer readable. Each email address has its own unique hexadecimal string that remains consistent no matter where the email address is used.
Ad Management and Signal (collect); Data (procure)
IP address
An Internet Protocol address (IP address) is a numerical label assigned by an Internet Service Provider (ISP) to each device connected to a computer network that allows the device to communicate on the Internet. Most IP addresses are dynamic, meaning they change every time the device is restarted.  IP addresses allow us to infer your general location in order to help us understand your data rights.
All Services and Site
Mobile advertising ID
Mobile advertising IDs are provided by the mobile device’s operating system, and can be reset by users. Typical advertising IDs are AAID/GAID (Android) and IDFA (Apple). Mobile advertising IDs allow developers and marketers to track activity associated with a specific device for targeted advertising purposes.
Exchange (collect) and Data (procure)
Personally Identifiable Information (“PII”)
Personal Information that directly identifies an individual such as name, surname and email address. PII may be required for some inquiries through the Site. Sovrn will only collect PII you voluntarily provide.
Site
Unique online identifier
An identifier created by our Publishers to understand an individual’s browsing behavior on their own site, as well as across different websites. These identifiers are shared with Sovrn to help us understand the preferences of individuals so that we can provide our targeted advertising services.
All Services and Site
Voice Recordings
When our customers interact with Sovrn through virtual meetings or by telephone, we may record the call to assist with taking notes and for internal training purposes
Sovrn Sales and Support Teams
How We Collect Information
Sovrn uses various technologies to collect both Personal- and Non-Personal Information, such as cookies, web beacons, tracking pixels, or scripts. We also collect information voluntarily provided through our Site. The term ‘cookies’ is used as an umbrella term for these technologies; for convenience, these technologies are collectively referred to in this Privacy Policy as “cookies.”
Both session cookies (which expire once the web browser is closed) and persistent cookies (which stay on a device until deleted or expire) are used to collect viewing and search behaviors by both Sovrn Services and the Site. For more information about how cookies are used or what information we collect, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
Through our Site
We collect Personal Information submitted to us voluntarily, such as name and contact information. For example, when signing up to receive our newsletter or to participate in a webinar we collect your email address. When contacting us via email, we will collect the email contents.
Through Sovrn Services
The information we gather about browsing preferences and purchasing behaviors using cookies helps us provide Sovrn Services to our Publishers, which in turn provides meaningful Interest-based Advertising to Readers.
Readers
.
We set cookies (where allowed) at the first visit to any of the Publisher sites that deploy Sovrn Services. If our cookie is already set on a browser, we recognize a returning Reader and log data using the existing cookie. Readers have the option to use tools provided by browsers to decline to receive cookies or to clear cookies, which will result in us treating the Reader as a new visitor when encountering Sovrn Services. However, in order to stop Interest-based Advertising by Sovrn, individuals must explicitly opt-out as described in the “
How to Opt-Out
” section.
Some of our business partners (for example, Google Analytics) may set or use their own cookies on our Publisher websites or through Sovrn Services where Sovrn has no access to or control over these cookies. Specific to Google Analytics, opt-out by visiting
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout/
Publishers
.
Publishers provide Personal Information about themselves when registering to use Sovrn Services. Alternatively, Publishers may register for Sovrn Services using an existing Google account, in which case Sovrn will receive Personal Information from Google as defined by Google’s privacy policy. Personal Information collected at registration may include: a valid email address, username and password, first and last name, telephone number, website(s) URLs, software, mobile applications, log-in IP address(es), physical address, ZIP code, and country of residence for the Publisher contact.
When using the Sovrn Platform to manage your account, we will also set cookies that allow us to remember your preferences, as well as to collect analytics about how our customers are interacting with the service.
We collect Publisher payment information from those who purchase Sovrn Services. Sovrn provides a third-party service to manage revenue payments to Publishers. This service also provides transactional information to Sovrn for financial reporting purposes.
We may also collect and categorize information about the content on Publisher pages integrated with Sovrn Services and link this information to Personal Information collected through the delivery of Sovrn Services.
Publishers may choose not to provide us with certain Personal Information, but this may limit the features of the Sovrn Services available for use.
Through Internet-Connected Technology
As Publishers use the Sovrn Services or Readers access or use digital properties within the Sovrn Publisher network (including websites or applications on internet-connected technology, such as computers, mobile devices, or internet-connected televisions), we may also collect web viewing and search activities across non-affiliated websites (including websites accessed through your television), directly through content viewed on an internet-connected television, and mobile applications (
“apps”
) over time (also known as cross-device tracking). This information may be linked to Personal Information that identifies a browser or device, typically through cookies or tracking pixels/web beacons.
Sovrn may store cookies on your device in order to:
For Publishers, to allow you to use and access secure areas of Sovrn Services. Without these cookies, it may not be possible to load or offer key functionalities, such as logging in to your account, displaying dynamic elements or uploading information.
For both Publishers and Readers, for statistical purposes and to analyze and improve the use and performance of Sovrn Services and the Site, and to do the same for our Publishers’ websites. We also use cookies for a better online experience, as cookies allow us to load or offer key functionalities on our Site, such as displaying dynamic elements or uploading information.
For Readers, to support Sovrn Services, such as for our analytics and data services and to provide Readers with Interest-based Advertising, including through Google’s Exchange Bidding service, and the ability to opt out of such advertising, all as further described in this Privacy Policy. We also use cookies for social media and multimedia functionalities, where videos and other media often rely on cookies to function correctly. In addition, social media platforms such as Facebook and X can use cookies to see if you are logged in and enable you to “like” content or send it to your friends. When you use these features, such third-party companies can collect information from you. Depending on your settings, these external parties may also use such information for advertising purposes. If you would like to know more about this, please refer to the respective privacy policies of these third parties.
In some instances, our business partners link the information we gather through cookies to device identifiers associated with the same Reader (also known as cross-device mapping). They will then share the cross-device mapping or other user data with us, for the purpose of Interest-based Advertising.
We may also use web beacons or “pixels” to collect Personal Information, which are electronic images that may be used on website(s) (including Publisher websites and the Site) or in emails sent in Publisher campaigns or from Sovrn directly. We use tracking pixels to, for example, collect hashed emails, sync unique online identifiers, deliver cookies, count visits, understand usage and effectiveness of offers, and tell whether an email has been opened and acted upon.
In addition, we may use session replay technologies for certain automatic data collection from Publishers on the Sovrn Platform. Session replay technology is third-party software used to record a replay of users’ interactions on the Sovrn Platform (such as to troubleshoot how a Publisher interacts with our dashboard). The replay may include users’ clicks, mouse movements, scrolls, mobile app touches, typing, and other activity taken during the session. We use these replays for research and development purposes, such as to help us troubleshoot problems with the Sovrn Services, understand how Publishers interact with and use the Sovrn Services, and identify areas for improvement.
Information from Third-Party Sources
We may receive Personal- and Non-Personal Information about you from other sources and combine it with the information that we collect through Sovrn Services or the Site. Sources may include information conveyed to us by telephone, information that we receive from third-party data providers, or information provided to us by third parties through the Sovrn Publisher network.
When Publishers contact Sovrn by telephone or virtual meeting, we use a third-party service to record the call (with your consent) to assist in documentation and for training purposes.  For clarity, we will only record those actively in the call; if there are others in the vicinity, it is our expectation that they are not recorded unintentionally, unless this Privacy Policy has been provided and their approval to the recording has been obtained.
How We Use Information
We use Personal- and Non-Personal Information to support our commercial interests (Interest-based Advertising, affiliate network marketing, and Data), internal business operations (such as improving the Services, fraud prevention and security), and business intelligence.
Commercial Interests
Commercial interests are activities that allow Sovrn and/or our customers and business partners (such partners include data services and data resellers) to earn revenue and include, for example:
Serving Interest-based Advertising to Readers on behalf of our Publishers and supporting third parties’ Interest-Based Advertising activities. Options for opting-out of such advertising may be found in the “
How to Opt-Out
” section of this Privacy Policy.
Providing Sovrn Services, or any other materials requested through the Site (such as electronic newsletters or promotional emails) to Publishers. Options for opting-out of Sovrn marketing may be found in the “
How to Opt-Out
” section of this Privacy Policy.
Creating audience segments* by categorizing Personal Information we have collected by common interests, intent or other characteristics (for clarity, PII is not used for this purpose).  Audience segments are used to provide additional insights, enrichment of our Publisher’s first party data, and to attribute reader interests to browsers and devices to better inform advertising campaigns.
Specific to Sovrn Commerce, we will use Personal Information to optimize links, determine the best merchant destination for clicks, and set the appropriate language and region for click destinations.
We may use Publisher contact information to invite you to take part in market research.
* We do not use Personal Information to derive audience segments that could be defined as ‘sensitive’ or ‘special categories’ under various data privacy laws and regulations.  Please visit Sovrn’s
Audience Segments
page for more information.
Internal Business Operations
Internal business operations are activities that allow us to meet obligations to Publishers, Readers, and third-party partners (including regulatory bodies). Internal business operations do not directly benefit any one person or entity, and include, for example:
Auditing related to counting ad impressions to unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions, and auditing compliance with various data privacy laws and regulations, as well as other standards.
Auditing related to counting ad impressions to unique visitors, verifying positioning and quality of ad impressions, and auditing compliance with various data privacy laws and regulations, as well as other standards.
Debugging to identify and repair errors that impair existing intended functionality of our products, content, services and websites.
Improve and protect our products, content, services and websites, to the extent the use of the Personal Information is reasonably necessary and proportionate for these purposes.
Performing services, including maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, processing or fulfilling orders and transactions, verifying Publisher information, processing payments, or providing analytic services.
Monitoring any Publisher account to prevent, investigate and/or report fraud, terrorism, misrepresentation, security incidents or crime, in accordance with applicable law.
Compliance with applicable laws and to protect Sovrn’s legitimate business interests and legal rights, including, but not limited to, use in connection with legal claims, compliance, regulatory, investigative purposes (including disclosure of such information in connection with law enforcement requests, legal process or litigation), protecting our and others’ rights, privacy, safety, or property, and enforcing our agreements.
Responding to comments or complaints or sending service-related communications.
Business Intelligence
Business intelligence allows us to analyze and report on the performance of Sovrn Services and the Site, as that performance relates to Publisher or Sovrn campaigns, and includes:
Monitoring the use of Sovrn Services to support Publisher analytics and reporting.
Undertaking internal research for technological development and demonstration.
Performing Analytical Analysis. We work with third parties that collect data about Reader use of the Site and other websites or online services over time for non-advertising purposes. For example, we use Google Analytics and other third-party services to improve the performance of Sovrn Services and for analytics and marketing purposes. For more information about how Google Analytics collects and uses data,  visit
https://policies.google.com/technologies/partner-sites
. Opt-out of Google Analytics by visiting
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout/
.
A Note on Non-Personal Information
We may collect Non-Personal Information through Sovrn Services or we may create Non-Personal Information from Personal Information by removing identifying information (such as email address or device identifiers).
We may use Non-Personal Information for a variety of purposes to operate and improve the Sovrn Services, such as functional testing, analyzing usage patterns, market research, data analysis (including in support of Interest-Based Advertising), and developing new products.
We may also use Non-Personal Information on Readers’ activities collected from Publisher websites (such as page views, use of ad blocking technology, and search queries) to provide aggregate information to Publishers so that they can improve their content and optimize advertising revenue.
We may use and disclose Non-Personal Information for any purpose in our discretion, to the extent permitted under applicable law. If we are required to treat Non-Personal Information as Personal Information under applicable law, then we may use or disclose it for all the purposes for which we use and disclose Personal Information.
Our Information Sharing Practices
Sovrn shares the Personal Information collected through our Services, procured through our data partners, or our Site with the following third parties and as otherwise described in this Privacy Policy:
Affiliates
: Sovrn may share some or all Reader Personal Information with our Affiliates (i.e. companies which are under common control, such as subsidiaries or joint ventures), in which case we will require our Affiliates to honor this Privacy Policy in all material respects.  Please reference the
Sovrn Careers
page to view our affiliate locations.
Business Transitions
: In the event Sovrn goes through a business transition such as a merger, acquisition by another company, or sale of all or a portion of its assets including in bankruptcy, Personal Information may be among the assets transferred.
Law Enforcement, Government Authorities, and Private Parties
: We may disclose Personal Information if we believe in good faith that such disclosure is necessary to (a) comply with relevant laws or to respond to subpoenas or warrants served on us; (b) to protect and defend the rights or property of Sovrn, Publishers, or third parties; or (c) for the other compliance, fraud prevention, and safety purposes described in this Privacy Policy.  Please see our
Law Enforcement Request Policy
for the requirements applicable to law enforcement requests.
Publishers
: We may disclose Personal Information that identifies a device or browser to Publishers and their service providers to provide the Sovrn Services, such as measuring the effectiveness of advertising, advertising attribution, and preventing advertising fraud, or to indicate Reader preferences for Interest-Based Advertising.
Other Third-Party Customers
: We may disclose Personal Information that identifies a device or browser to our third-party customers that include, for example, other advertising services and data enrichment services, who will use and disclose the information for their own purposes. We may also share Non-Personal Information such as aggregated reports derived in part from the information we have collected. The information we share may also be combined with third-party data to provide an even broader service to our customers. Please see
How to Opt-Out
for more information on choices related to this practice.
Service Providers
: We may provide Personal Information to third-party service providers (sub-/processors) who work on behalf of or with us to provide the Sovrn Services including to help us communicate with you. Examples of such services include our ability to send email, perform data analysis, provide marketing assistance, process payments (including credit card payments, through a third-party service), and provide customer service. For a list of our Service Providers, please visit
https://www.sovrn.com/legal/subprocessors/
Advertising Partners:
We may share your Personal Information with third parties that we partner with to engage in Interest-Based Advertising, including through the use of cookies and similar technologies. These third party advertising companies may collect information about your activity over time through the Services and across other online services to serve you advertisements. For a list of our Advertising Partners, please visit
https://www.sovrn.com/privacy-policy/third-parties/
.
Professional Advisors
: We may share Personal Information with persons, companies, or professional firms providing Sovrn with advice and consulting in accounting, administrative, legal, tax, financial, debt collection, and other matters.
How To Opt Out
Sovrn supports various opt-out mechanisms, where each option provides different results related to cross-device tracking and targeted advertising. While using these mechanisms may prevent Interest-based Advertising or the sale of your Personal Information, there are no mechanisms for preventing advertising altogether.
Opting Out of Sovrn’s Interest-based Advertising
Just as there are different mechanisms for providing Interest-based Advertising (such as through a web browser, apps on your mobile device and connected televisions), there are multiple ways you can limit the use of your personal information for targeted advertising purposes and the sale or sharing of your personal information.
To simplify the management of Interest-based Advertising preferences, Sovrn participates in the Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA)
AdChoices program
that allows a user to manage their Interest-based Advertising preferences on their browser(s) or device(s) across all participating DAA members.
For more information on how to opt-out of the sale or sharing of personal information, please see the section, “
Your California Privacy Rights
” located in the “
Country and US State Specific Disclosures
” section, below or our webform found in the
Privacy Center
.
Cookies and Unique Online Identifiers Used by Web Browsers
Your opt-out choice will apply to the browser or device where you make the choice. This means that Sovrn will not deliver Interest-based Advertising to this browser or device and we will not otherwise use or transfer data collected on this browser or device for Interest-based Advertising.
Readers who wish to opt out of Sovrn’s collection, use, or transfer of such data from a browser for Interest-based Advertising purposes can visit
https://www.aboutads.info/
to learn more about Interest-based Advertising.  There, you may also access the
DAA WebChoices
tool for managing preferences on web browsers, and to exercise opt-out choice with respect to Sovrn and other companies participating in the DAA’s self-regulatory program.
Identifiers used by connected TVs and mobile devices / apps
Readers who wish to opt-out of Sovrn’s collection, use, or transfer of such data from apps on a mobile device for Interest-based Advertising purposes can download the
DAA’s AppChoices
application to manage preferences on mobile platforms like Android or Apple iOS devices.  More information on your options for opting out of targeted advertising provided through your connected television streaming devices can be found on the
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI)
site.
When using DAA’s opt-out tools, choice will be effective only on the browser or device where choice has been exercised. If using a different device or browser, the opt-out choice(s) will need to be renewed for the new device or browser. Our opt-out tool for browsers is cookie-based, so that an opt-out choice can only be honored if a browser is set to accept third-party cookies. If the opt-out cookie is deleted, then the opt-out choice(s) must be renewed.
Opting out of Interest-based Advertising prevents the collection of Personal Information but does not prevent data collection of Non-Personal Information.  We may continue to collect, use and transfer such Non-Personal Information for other purposes such as contextual advertising based on a current visit to a website, fraud prevention, or improving site performance.
Opting out also will not stop advertising from appearing in a browser. After opting-out, Readers may receive advertising from Sovrn Services when visiting websites of a Publisher who uses our Services, but that advertising will not be interest-based. After opting out of Sovrn’s Interest-based Advertising, Readers may also continue to receive Interest-based Advertising through other companies.
Opting Out of Sovrn’s Affiliate Network Marketing
Readers who wish to opt-out of Sovrn Commerce collection, use, or transfer of Personal Information from the websites you visit, the links you click, or the merchants you make purchases from, visit our
Privacy Center
and choose ‘Disable Tracking.’
Opting out of Sovrn Commerce cookies means that Sovrn Commerce will stop placing cookies on your device when you browse Sovrn Commerce enabled websites and/or links.
To honor your opt-out choice, we need to place a cookie on your device so that we know not to track your activity. Clearing your browser’s cache or cookies will remove this cookie, and you will be required to opt-out of tracking again. Similarly, if you access sites that use Sovrn Commerce from a different browser or device than the browser or device on which you opted-out of tracking, you will be required to opt-out again.
Opting Out of Sovrn Marketing
Unsubscribe instructions will accompany each promotional email we send. Alternatively, contact us directly to change promotional email preferences at marketing@sovrn[.]com.
Regardless of your promotional communication preferences, we will send Publishers messages related to our business relationship or transactions.
For any questions regarding a Sovrn Publisher account, please contact support@sovrn[.]com.
Advertising Choices on the Site
Some of the Advertising Partners that collect data on the Site to help us advertise the Sovrn Services and our business may also participate in the DAA and/or may be members of the Network Advertising Initiative (NAI). You can obtain more information about these companies’ information collection practices, and opt-out of receiving interest-based advertising from participating NAI and DAA members, at the
NAI’s website
or the
DAA’s website
. You can also limit collection of your information for Interest-Based Advertising by blocking third party cookies in your browser settings or using privacy plug-ins or ad blocking software that help you block third party cookies.
Many of the opt-out preferences described in this section must be set on each device and/or browser for which you want them to apply. Please note that some of the Advertising Partners we work with may not participate in the opt-out mechanisms described above, so even after opting-out, you may still receive Interest-Based Advertising from other companies. If you opt-out of Interest-Based Advertising, you will still see advertisements online but they may be less relevant to you.
Children’s Privacy
Sovrn does not knowingly collect Personal Information from or direct Sovrn Services to children under the age of 16.
If you are not 16 years old, please do not use the Site. Do not submit your name, email address, or other personal information using our web forms.
As operators of their own websites and content, our Publishers are solely responsible for compliance with law related to the collection and use of information from children under the age of 16. If, during routine review, Sovrn believes children under the age of 16 have submitted their personal information into our web forms or our customer’s websites, we will, in our sole discretion, delete the information believed to belong to those under 16 years old.
Retention of Personal Information
We will retain Personal Information for as long as necessary to fulfill the purpose of collection, including for the purposes of satisfying any legal, accounting, or reporting requirements, to establish and defend legal claims, for fraud prevention purposes, or as long as required to meet our legal obligations. To determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Information, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the Personal Information, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Information, the purposes for which we process your Personal Information and whether we can achieve those purposes through other means, and the applicable legal requirements.
Security
Sovrn has put in place commercially reasonable physical, electronic, and managerial procedures to safeguard and secure the Personal Information we collect; however, no method of transmission over the Internet, or method of electronic storage, is 100% secure. As a result, we cannot guarantee the absolute security of your Personal Information. For more information, please visit
Sovrn’s Security
page.
Country and US State Specific Disclosures
Various data privacy laws require specific disclosures regarding the collection and use of your Personal Information. These disclosures are meant to supplement, and are consistent with, the practices described in this Privacy Policy.
Notice to Residents of the EEA, Switzerland and UK: Data Subject Rights
This section applies only to individuals located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), Switzerland or the United Kingdom (“Applicable Countries”) and supplements the practices described in this Privacy Policy. It describes certain rights and protections under applicable law regarding the processing of Personal Information. For purposes of this section, “Personal Information” has the meaning given to “personal data” governed by the Applicable Countries’ data protection legislation.
Role of Sovrn as a Controller or Processor
If located in one of the Applicable Countries, Sovrn may act as a “controller” as defined under applicable law when processing Personal Information. Sovrn may also act as a “processor” as defined under applicable law to the extent that we process Personal Information on behalf of and at the instruction of another party, for example a Sovrn customer.
Legal Basis for Processing
Sovrn’s legal basis for processing Personal Information depends upon the specific context in which it is collected or used. In some cases, we rely on data subject consent (as defined under applicable law) to process Personal Information for Interest-Based Advertising, which we require Publishers using Sovrn Services to obtain on our behalf. In other cases, we may rely on our legitimate interests to collect and use Personal Information, except where our interests are overridden by data-protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. For example, we will also process Personal Information collected from Interest-Based Advertising in order to improve the Sovrn Services for our Publishers where permitted by law. Our legitimate interests are described in greater detail in the “
How We Use Information
” section of this Privacy Policy. These legitimate interests include the operation of our business and the provision of Sovrn Services to our Publishers as required by our agreements with them.
Additionally, we may have a legal obligation to process Personal Information (such as for fraud prevention).
Exercising Data Subject Rights
Individuals may be entitled to exercise certain data subject rights available under applicable laws. These rights may include the right to request access to Personal Information we hold. Individuals may also have the right to object to, or request that we restrict, processing of Personal Information, such as profiling we perform for the purposes of direct marketing and interest-based advertising. Individuals may also have the right to ask that your Personal Information be corrected, erased, or transferred to another party. Where we have asked for consent to process data, consent may be withdrawn.
Anyone afforded any of these rights may exercise them by visiting our
Privacy Center
, or by contacting privacy@sovrn[.]com.
These rights may be limited in some situations–for example, where we can demonstrate that we have a legal requirement to process data. In some instances, this may mean that we are able to retain data even if consent is withdrawn. In other instances, we may provide the requested information with some portions redacted in order to adhere to obligations of confidentiality to others.
Where we require Personal Information to comply with legal or contractual obligations, provision of Personal Information is mandatory; in all other cases, provision of requested Personal Information is optional.
Data Transfers
Sovrn is a global company headquartered in Boulder, Colorado (USA), with data centers located in the United States and Europe. By visiting Publisher’s sites who are using Sovrn Services, Personal Information may be transferred to, stored, and processed by us, our affiliates, and by those third parties with whom we may share your information, some of which are located outside of the Applicable Countries.
These countries (including the United States) may have data protection or other laws that differ from those in the Applicable Countries. We ensure that where Sovrn or third-party service providers receive Personal Information outside of the Applicable Countries, appropriate safeguards are in place under the Applicable Countries’ data protection legislation.
Sovrn may be required to disclose Personal Information in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements. Such requests are subject to Sovrn’s
Law Enforcement Request Policy
.
IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
Sovrn is registered as a vendor with, and supports and encourages our clients to use, the
IAB Europe Transparency and Consent Framework
(the “IAB Industry Framework”) to provide data subjects with dynamic transparency into and choice about the various vendors our clients use to serve ads, including Sovrn Services. When visiting a website, the IAB Industry Framework is designed to allow a Publisher the means to choose which registered vendors they wish to allow to access a device and process Personal Information, and provide dynamic transparency and choice about each of these vendors (either an opportunity for an individual to consent to the vendor, or opt out of data processing by the vendor, depending on that vendor’s legal basis and processing activities).
Questions or Complaints
Individuals located in one of the Applicable Countries who have questions or concerns about how we process Personal Information may contact our Data Protection Officer at dpo@sovrn.com. If we are not able to resolve the issue, individuals have the right to lodge a complaint with their local data privacy authority. For contact details of local Data Protection Authorities, please visit the
European Data Protection Board member list
or the
UK data protection regulator
.
IT Governance Europe Limited acts as our EU representative. If you wish to exercise your rights under the EU General Data Protection Regulation (EU GDPR) or have any queries in relation to your rights or general privacy matters, please email
eurep@itgovernance.eu
. Please ensure to include our company name (“Sovrn”) in any correspondence.
Notice to California Residents: Your Privacy Choices
This section applies only to California residents and supplements the practices described in this Privacy Policy.  It describes how we collect, use, sell, share, and retain Personal Information of California residents, and their rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this section, “Personal Information” has the meaning given in the California privacy laws but does not include information exempted from the scope of those laws.
Personal Information We Collect and Purposes of Collection and Use
Personal Information we collect (or have collected in the 12 months preceding the “Effective Date” of this Privacy Policy) about California residents are listed below by reference to the categories specified under California privacy law. Examples in the list refer to the types of Personal Information described above in this Privacy Policy.
Identifiers
, such as cookie ID, unique online identifiers, device information, hashed email, IP address, connected television ID, and mobile advertising ID.
Customer Records
, such as Publisher PII and payment information.
Commercial information
, such as records of products or services purchased, obtained or considered.
Internet or Network Activity
, such as browsing history, search history, and interactions with a website, email, application, or advertisement.
Inferences
drawn from the Personal Information identified above to create a profile reflecting preferences, characteristics or behavior.
We may collect these categories of Personal Information directly from you and from your device as you visit our Site or Publisher sites in our network subscribing to Sovrn Services, or from other third parties as further described in this Privacy Policy under the section titled
“How We Collect Information.”
The purposes, including the specific business and commercial purposes, for which we collect and use these categories of Personal Information are described in this Privacy Policy under the section titled
“How We Use Personal Information.”
To the extent that we may collect any sensitive Personal Information (as defined under California privacy law), such as to provide account management for our Publishers, we only use or disclose it for purposes permitted under California law (i.e., to perform the Sovrn Services, process customer transactions, detect security incidents and prevent fraud, or to verify and maintain the quality of the Services). We do not collect or use sensitive personal information for the purpose of inferring characteristics about California residents.
We retain each of the categories of Personal Information listed above as described in this Privacy Policy under the section titled
“Retention of Personal Data.”
Personal Information “Sold,” “Shared” or Disclosed for Business Purposes
“Sale” is defined under California privacy law as disclosing a California resident’s Personal Information to a third party for monetary or other valuable consideration.  Where such disclosure is for cross-context behavioral advertising, whether or not for monetary or other valuable consideration, it qualifies as “sharing” under California privacy law.
The following table describes the categories of Personal Information “sold” or “shared” for our commercial purposes to each of the categories of third parties listed, and includes our practices in the 12 months preceding the “Effective Date” of this Privacy Policy.
Each category of Personal Information listed in the following table may also have been disclosed for our business purposes (such as for internal use and business intelligence), and have in the preceding 12 months been disclosed, to each of the categories of third parties listed.
The categories of third parties listed, along with our business and commercial purposes for which we “sold,” “shared” or disclosed Personal Information, are described in this Privacy Policy under
“Our Information Sharing Practices”
within the section titled,
“How We Use Information.”
Category of Personal Information
To whom the category of Personal Information is “sold” or “shared”
Identifiers
· Sovrn Publishers
· Advertising Partners
· Other Third-Party Customers (i.e., Data partners, such as data services and resellers)
Customer Records
N/A
Commercial Information
· Sovrn Publishers
· Advertising Partners
· Other Third-Party Customers (i.e., Data partners, such as data services and resellers)
Internet or Network Activity
· Sovrn Publishers
· Advertising Partners
· Other Third-Party Customers (i.e., Data partners, such as data services and resellers)
Inferences
· Sovrn Publishers
· Advertising Partners
· Other Third-Party Customers (i.e., Data partners, such as data services and resellers)
For clarity, Personal Information collected through Sovrn Services, from third parties,  or Internet Connected Technology, (and where Sovrn has a license to further disclose Personal Information to third parties) is included in our commercial Data and “sold” or “shared.” Publisher Personal Information provided for account management is not “sold” or “shared” as defined under California privacy law.
California consumers may request to
opt-out of the sale or sharing
of their Personal Information at any time. Please see “Your California Privacy Rights” below for more information.
Sovrn does not knowingly “sell” or “share” the Personal Information of California residents under 16 years of age.
Your California Privacy Rights
As a California resident, in addition to the rights described elsewhere in this Privacy Policy, you have the privacy rights listed below.  However, these rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may not be able to respond to your request, such as when a legal exemption applies or if we are not able to verify your identity.
Know/Access
. You can request the following information about how we have collected and used your Personal Information:
– The categories of Personal Information that we have collected.
– The categories of sources from which we collected Personal Information.
– The business or commercial purpose for collecting, “selling,” or “sharing” Personal Information.
– The categories of third parties with whom we disclose Personal Information.
– A copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you.
Delete
. You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
Correct
. You can ask us to correct inaccurate Personal Information that we maintain about you.
Opt-out of sales/sharing
. If we “sell” or “share” your Personal Information, you can opt-out.
Nondiscrimination
. You are entitled to exercise the rights described above without receiving discriminatory treatment.
You may request to exercise the California privacy rights described above as follows:
Right to know/access, delete, or correct
. You can request to exercise your access, deletion, or correction rights by:
– Visiting our Privacy Center and completing the
data rights request webform
;
– Emailing privacy@sovrn[.]com – Please put the statement “CCPA Consumer Request” in the subject line; or
– Calling +1 (888) 280-8085.
Right to opt-out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information
. You can request to opt-out of the “sale” or “sharing” of your Personal Information by clicking here:
Your Privacy Choices
and completing the webform or broadcasting the Global Privacy Control (GPC) signal through your browser settings.
– Our Services will honor the GPC signal you broadcast so that the Personal Information that you provide to the Publishers using our Services will be opted-out from “sales” or “sharing.”
– Note that due to technological limitations, if you visit our Services or the Site from a different computer or device, or clear cookies on your browser that store your preferences, you will need to return to the
Your Privacy Choices
page to re-submit your preferences.
– If you direct us not to sell/share your Personal Information, we will consider it a request pursuant to California’s “Shine the Light” law to stop sharing your Personal Information covered by that law with third parties for their direct marketing purposes.
Please visit our
CCPA Metrics page
for details around the type of data rights requests received during the previous calendar year.
Verification Process and Required Information
We reserve the right to confirm your California residence to process your requests and will need to confirm your identity to process your requests to exercise your right to know/access, delete, and correct. This is a security measure to, for example, help ensure we do not disclose information to a person who is not entitled to receive it. The identity verification process may vary depending on how you submit your request. We will only ask for information needed to verify your identity, such as a different email address, or cookie ID.
Authorized Agent
Consistent with California law, you may designate an authorized agent to make a request on your behalf. If you do so, we may require proof of your identification, the authorized agent’s proof of identification, and any other information that we may request in order to verify the request, including evidence of valid permission for the authorized agent to act on your behalf. We cannot process your request if you do not provide us with sufficient detail to allow us to understand and respond to it. Authorized agents may submit a request through our
Privacy Center
, where instructions are provided for completing the request.
Fees
You will not have to pay a fee to access your personal information (or to exercise any of the other rights).  However, we may charge a reasonable fee or decline to comply with your request if your request is clearly unfounded, repetitive, or excessive.
Changes in this Privacy Policy
We may modify or amend this Privacy Policy from time to time at our discretion. When we make material changes to this Privacy Policy, we will amend the revision date at the top of this page and such modified or amended Privacy Policy shall be effective as to the Personal Information governed by this Privacy Policy as of that revision date. We encourage periodic review of this Privacy Policy to view any updates, as well as the revision log found at the end of this page.
Contact Us
Please contact us at privacy@sovrn[.]com with questions or concerns regarding our Privacy Policy or how we process your Personal Information.
Sovrn will respond in good faith to all privacy inquiries but may not be able to provide complete information if the request requires Sovrn to release confidential information of third parties, or otherwise imposes an undue burden or expense.
Sovrn U.S. Headquarters
1600 Pearl St
Second Floor
Boulder, CO 80302
United States
Sovrn U.K. Headquarters
53, 64 Chancery Ln,
London WC2A 1QU
United Kingdom
Sovrn Switzerland, S.A.
Via Cantonale 19, CH-
6900 Lugano
Switzerland
Revision Log
Section
Revision summary
Version
Our Commitment to Good Advertising Practices & How to Opt Out
Removed information related to the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) YourOnlineChoices program
Dec. 2023
Information We Collect
Updated Privacy Policy to disclose the collection of voice recordings to support Publisher Sales and Support teams
Sep. 2023
Notice to Residents of the EEA, Switzerland and UK: Data Subject Rights; Contacts
Updated semantics for readability; updated Sovrn UK, Limited address
Aug. 2023
Information We Collect; How We Collect Information & How We Use Information
Updated Privacy Policy to disclose additional identifiers processed due to new offered services
Aug. 2023
Information We Collect; How We Collect Information & How We Use Information
Updated Privacy Policy to disclose additional identifiers processed due to new offered services
Apr. 2023
Throughout
Updated Privacy Policy for required disclosures under new US state privacy laws in effect Jan 1 2023, and for general readability
Jan. 2023
Our Commitment to Good Advertising Practices & How to Opt Out
Added information related to our integration with the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) YourOnlineChoices program
Aug. 2022
Throughout
Revised email addresses throughout to reduce spam
Aug. 2022
Exercising California Consumer Rights
Replaced toll-free number with new toll-free number
Aug. 2022
Entire Policy
Consolidated Website and Service Privacy Policies, reordered sections, and updated internal links.
Apr. 2021
Information We Collect
Added ‘Universal ID’ to the list of Personal Information types
Apr. 2021
Personal Data Rights (throughout)
Separation of UK from EU personal data rights as a result of the enactment of the UK GDPR
Feb. 2021
Personal Data Rights: Questions or Complaints
Addition of EU representative as a result of the UK’s exit from the EU
Feb. 2021
Revision Log
New section added for clarity of changes over time
Feb. 2021
We use cookies on our website to give you the most relevant experience by remembering your preferences and repeat visits. By clicking “Accept”, you consent to the use of ALL the cookies, but may change your preferences by clicking “Cookie settings". For more information, please visit our
Privacy Policy
.
Cookie settings
Manage cookie consent
Close
Privacy Overview
This website uses cookies to improve your experience while you navigate through the website. Out of these cookies, the cookies that are categorized as necessary are stored on your browser as they are essential for the working of basic functionalities...
Necessary cookies are absolutely essential for the website to function properly. These cookies ensure basic functionalities and security features of the website, anonymously.
Cookie
Duration
Description
__hssrc
session
This cookie is set by Hubspot whenever it changes the session cookie. The __hssrc cookie set to 1 indicates that the user has restarted the browser, and if the cookie does not exist, it is assumed to be a new session.
cookielawinfo-checkbox-advertisement
1 year
Set by the GDPR Cookie Consent plugin, this cookie is used to record the user consent for the cookies in the "Advertisement" category .
cookielawinfo-checkbox-analytics
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookie is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Analytics".
cookielawinfo-checkbox-functional
11 months
The cookie is set by GDPR cookie consent to record the user consent for the cookies in the category "Functional".
cookielawinfo-checkbox-necessary
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookies is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Necessary".
cookielawinfo-checkbox-others
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookie is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Other.
cookielawinfo-checkbox-performance
11 months
This cookie is set by GDPR Cookie Consent plugin. The cookie is used to store the user consent for the cookies in the category "Performance".
csrftoken
1 year
This cookie is associated with Django web development platform for python. Used to help protect the website against Cross-Site Request Forgery attacks
viewed_cookie_policy
11 months
The cookie is set by the GDPR Cookie Consent plugin and is used to store whether or not user has consented to the use of cookies. It does not store any personal data.
Functional cookies help to perform certain functionalities like sharing the content of the website on social media platforms, collect feedbacks, and other third-party features.
Cookie
Duration
Description
__cf_bm
30 minutes
This cookie, set by Cloudflare, is used to support Cloudflare Bot Management.
__hssc
30 minutes
HubSpot sets this cookie to keep track of sessions and to determine if HubSpot should increment the session number and timestamps in the __hstc cookie.
_auth
1 year
This cookie is set by Pinterest that collects statistical details to track the use of its services.
_pinterest_referrer
past
This cookie is set by Pinterest to track the use of its services.
_pinterest_sess
1 year
This cookie is set by Pinterest that collects statistical details to track the use of its services.
_routing_id
session
This cookie is set by Pinterest that collects statistical details to track the use of its services.
bcookie
2 years
LinkedIn sets this cookie from LinkedIn share buttons and ad tags to recognize browser ID.
lang
session
This cookie is used to store the language preferences of a user to serve up content in that stored language the next time user visit the website.
language
session
This cookie is used to store the language preference of the user.
lidc
1 day
LinkedIn sets the lidc cookie to facilitate data center selection.
sp_landing
1 day
The sp_landing is set by Spotify to implement audio content from Spotify on the website and also registers information on user interaction related to the audio content.
sp_t
1 year
The sp_t cookie is set by Spotify to implement audio content from Spotify on the website and also registers information on user interaction related to the audio content.
Performance cookies are used to understand and analyze the key performance indexes of the website which helps in delivering a better user experience for the visitors.
Analytical cookies are used to understand how visitors interact with the website. These cookies help provide information on metrics the number of visitors, bounce rate, traffic source, etc.
Cookie
Duration
Description
__hstc
1 year 24 days
This is the main cookie set by Hubspot, for tracking visitors. It contains the domain, initial timestamp (first visit), last timestamp (last visit), current timestamp (this visit), and session number (increments for each subsequent session).
_ga
2 years
The _ga cookie, installed by Google Analytics, calculates visitor, session and campaign data and also keeps track of site usage for the site's analytics report. The cookie stores information anonymously and assigns a randomly generated number to recognize unique visitors.
_gat_gtag_UA_52355958_2
1 minute
This cookie is set by Google and is used to distinguish users.
_gcl_au
3 months
Provided by Google Tag Manager to experiment advertisement efficiency of websites using their services.
_gid
1 day
Installed by Google Analytics, _gid cookie stores information on how visitors use a website, while also creating an analytics report of the website's performance. Some of the data that are collected include the number of visitors, their source, and the pages they visit anonymously.
hubspotutk
1 year 24 days
This cookie is used by HubSpot to keep track of the visitors to the website. This cookie is passed to Hubspot on form submission and used when deduplicating contacts.
vuid
2 years
Vimeo installs this cookie to collect tracking information by setting a unique ID to embed videos to the website.
Advertisement cookies are used to provide visitors with relevant ads and marketing campaigns. These cookies track visitors across websites and collect information to provide customized ads.
Cookie
Duration
Description
_mkto_datetime
1 month
This cookie is set by Marketo.
bscookie
2 years
This cookie is a browser ID cookie set by Linked share Buttons and ad tags.
test_cookie
15 minutes
The test_cookie is set by doubleclick.net and is used to determine if the user's browser supports cookies.
Other uncategorized cookies are those that are being analyzed and have not been classified into a category as yet.
Other uncategorized cookies are those that are being analyzed and have not been classified into a category as yet.
Sub-policy 7
https://www.network-n.com/network-privacy-policy/:
Network N - avatar
Profile
Introduction
We are committed to safeguarding the privacy of the website visitors of our service users.
This policy applies where we are acting as a data controller with respect to the personal data of our website visitors and service users; in other words, where we determine the purposes and means of the processing of that personal data.
We use cookies on our service users’ website. Insofar as those cookies are not strictly necessary for the provision of our website and services, we will ask you to consent to our use of cookies when you first visit our website.
In this policy, “we”, “us” and “our” refer to Network N Limited. For more information about us, see Section 13.
Credit
This document was created using a template from Docular:
https://docular.net
How we use your personal data
In this Section 3 we have set out:
(a) the general categories of personal data that we may process;
(b) in the case of personal data that we did not obtain directly from you, the source and specific categories of that data;
(c) the purposes for which we may process personal data; and
(d) the legal bases of the processing.
We may process data about your use of our service user (partner) website and services (“usage data“). The usage data may include your IP address, geographical location, browser type and version, operating system, referral source, length of visit, page views and website navigation paths, as well as information about the timing, frequency and pattern of your service use. The source of the usage data is our analytics tracking system. This usage data may be processed for the purposes of analysing the use of the website and services. The legal basis for this processing is consentorour legitimate interests, namely monitoring and improving our services.
In addition to the specific purposes for which we may process your personal data set out in this Section 3, we may also process any of your personal data where such processing is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, or in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person.
Please do not supply any other person’s personal data to us, unless we prompt you to do so.
Providing your personal data to others
We may disclose your personal data to any member of our group of companies (this means our subsidiaries, our ultimate holding company and all its subsidiaries) insofar as reasonably necessary for the purposes, and on the legal bases, set out in this policy.
We may disclose your personal data to our insurers and/or professional advisers insofar as reasonably necessary for the purposes of obtaining or maintaining insurance coverage, managing risks, obtaining professional advice, or the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims, whether in court proceedings or in an administrative or out-of-court procedure.
We may disclose your enquiry data to one or more of those selected third party suppliers of goods and services identified on our website for the purpose of enabling them to contact you so that they can offer, market and sell to you relevant goods and/or services. Each such third party will act as a data controller or data processor in relation to the enquiry data that we supply to it; and upon contacting you, each such third party will supply to you a copy of its own privacy policy, which will govern that third party’s use of your personal data.
In addition to the specific disclosures of personal data set out in this Section 4, we may disclose your personal data where such disclosure is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, or in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person. We may also disclose your personal data where such disclosure is necessary for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims, whether in court proceedings or in an administrative or out-of-court procedure.
International transfers of your personal data
In this Section 5, we provide information about the circumstances in which your personal data may be transferred to countries outside the European Economic Area (EEA).
The hosting facilities for our website are situated in US, Europe and UK. The European Commission has made an “adequacy decision” with respect to the data protection laws of each of these countries. Transfers to each of these countries will be protected by appropriate safeguards, namely EU-U.S. Privacy Shield Framework.
Mailing databases are situated in US and Australia. The European Commission has made an “adequacy decision” with respect to the data protection laws of each of these countries. Transfers to each of these countries will be protected by appropriate safeguards, namely  EU-U.S. Privacy Shield and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield.
You acknowledge that personal data that you submit for publication through our website or services may be available, via the internet, around the world. We cannot prevent the use (or misuse) of such personal data by others.
Retaining and deleting personal data
This Section 6 sets out our data retention policies and procedure, which are designed to help ensure that we comply with our legal obligations in relation to the retention and deletion of personal data.
Personal data that we process for any purpose or purposes shall not be kept for longer than is necessary for that purpose or those purposes.
We will retain and delete your personal data as follows:
(a) Profile data containing personal data will be retained for two years following your last login, if you have not logged in for over two years, you will be notified of this. If we have not received notification within 30 days of your intent to use your account we will delete your profile data and notify you of this deletion
(b) Cookie data will be retained for no longer than 30 days.
Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Section 6, we may retain your personal data where such retention is necessary for compliance with a legal obligation to which we are subject, or in order to protect your vital interests or the vital interests of another natural person.
Third party services incorporated into our website may collect information about your visits to our partner’s site for analytics, retargeting and conversion tracking purposes. This information could be combined with information collected from other sites.
You can opt out from third party platforms for marketing purposes at the following addresses.
Network Advertising Initiative:
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices
Digital Advertising Alliance:
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
Your Online Choices (Europe):
http://www.youronlinechoices.com
Amendments
We may update this policy from time to time by publishing a new version on our website.
You should check this page occasionally to ensure you are happy with any changes to this policy.
Your rights
In this Section 8, we have summarised the rights that you have under data protection law. Some of the rights are complex, and not all of the details have been included in our summaries. Accordingly, you should read the relevant laws and guidance from the regulatory authorities for a full explanation of these rights.
Your principal rights under General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) are:
(a) the right to access;
(b) the right to rectification;
(c) the right to erasure;
(d) the right to restrict processing;
(e) the right to object to processing;
(f) the right to data portability;
(g) the right to complain to a supervisory authority; and
(h) the right to withdraw consent
You have the right to confirmation as to whether or not we process your personal data and, where we do, access to the personal data, together with certain additional information. That additional information includes details of the purposes of the processing, the categories of personal data concerned and the recipients of the personal data. Providing the rights and freedoms of others are not affected, we will supply to you a copy of your personal data. The first copy will be provided free of charge, but additional copies may be subject to a reasonable fee. Provision of such information will be subject to:
(a) the first copy will be provided free of charge, but additional copies will be subjected to a GBP 10 administration fee; and
(b) the supply of appropriate evidence of your identity (for this purpose, we will usually accept a photocopy of your passport certified by a solicitor or bank plus an original copy of a utility bill showing your current address).
You have the right to have any inaccurate personal data about you rectified and, taking into account the purposes of the processing, to have any incomplete personal data about you completed.
In some circumstances you have the right to the erasure of your personal data without undue delay. Those circumstances include: the personal data are no longer necessary in relation to the purposes for which they were collected or otherwise processed; you withdraw consent to consent-based processing; you object to the processing under certain rules of applicable data protection law; the processing is for direct marketing purposes; and the personal data have been unlawfully processed. However, there are exclusions of the right to erasure. The general exclusions include where processing is necessary: for exercising the right of freedom of expression and information; for compliance with a legal obligation; or for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
In some circumstances you have the right to restrict the processing of your personal data. Those circumstances are: you contest the accuracy of the personal data; processing is unlawful but you oppose erasure; we no longer need the personal data for the purposes of our processing, but you require personal data for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims; and you have objected to processing, pending the verification of that objection. Where processing has been restricted on this basis, we may continue to store your personal data. However, we will only otherwise process it: with your consent; for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims; for the protection of the rights of another natural or legal person; or for reasons of important public interest.
You have the right to object to our processing of your personal data on grounds relating to your particular situation, but only to the extent that the legal basis for the processing is that the processing is necessary for: the performance of a task carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of any official authority vested in us; or the purposes of the legitimate interests pursued by us or by a third party. If you make such an objection, we will cease to process the personal information unless we can demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds for the processing which override your interests, rights and freedoms, or the processing is for the establishment, exercise or defence of legal claims.
You have the right to object to our processing of your personal data for direct marketing purposes (including profiling for direct marketing purposes). If you make such an objection, we will cease to process your personal data for this purpose.
If you consider that our processing of your personal information infringes data protection laws, you have a legal right to lodge a complaint with a supervisory authority responsible for data protection. You may do so in the EU member state of your habitual residence, your place of work or the place of the alleged infringement.
To the extent that the legal basis for our processing of your personal information is consent, you have the right to withdraw that consent at any time. Withdrawal will not affect the lawfulness of processing before the withdrawal.
You may exercise any of your rights in relation to your personal data by contacting us using the details outlined in section 13.
About cookies
We and our service providers use cookies and those cookies may be stored on your computer when you visit our partner’s site, for details on cookie, please refer to cookie policy
https://www.network-n.com/network-cookie-policy/
Our details
Network N Ltd. is a third party advertiser who helps partners monetise website through advertising.
We are registered in England and Wales under registration number 08063183, and our registered office is at Circus Mews House, Circus Mews, Bath, England, BA1 2PW.
Our principal place of business is at Circus Mews House, Circus Mews, Bath, England, BA1 2PW.
You can contact us:
(a) by post, using the postal address given above;
(b) by email, using this email address: data@network-n.com
Contact Us
Tweets by Network_N
Network N Ltd.
Circus Mews House, Circus Mews, Bath, BA1 2PW, UK
Telephone:
(+44) 01225 531631
Subject*
...
Advertising
Publishing
Editorial
Existing Partner
Other
Name*
Email address*
* Required fields
Send Message